Moms can shush their children or soothe them. Sometimes the consequences of shushing are simply not worth it.....
cover and add straw-
a) Say "thank you", but I've had more than enough.
Mix together the boiling water and Jell-O. If using frozen strawberries, add strawberries and allow mixture to set slightly before pouring over the filling - it shouldn't take very long. If using fresh strawberries, place the strawberries in the Jell-O and allow to sit in the refrigerator to set up before pouring over the filling.
everything they said.
She said, “Why not? If the system is going to f*ck us, then we should f*ck them.”
My parents weren’t entirely pacifist. My father [allegedly] started riots. My mother ran over a possum three times for eating her rose bushes — and I’m not sure that possum ate her rose bushes, I suspect she just likes getting violent. But still, as a child, I was not allowed to play with toys that looked like guns.
Mi Roo returns home thinking there’s no end to her relationship with Jin Oh. She keeps throwing stuff away but there are still remnants of it. She throws away the “falling star” rock and ends up hitting the landlord who’s walking by below. Haha, oops! Perhaps it might be helpful to look before you throw?
What a beautiful sentiment from the new Quote and Quotables and perfect for coordinating with birds or butterflies. I used the butterflies because they metamorphosis from the creeping of a caterpillar into the soaring beauty of the butterfly.
Late in his career, the psychologist Abraham Maslow studied high performing teams. One of their most striking characteristics was shared vision and purpose.
Note: What follows is my personal account of the events of that day. I did not take written notes at the Fet (a bit difficult when one is dancing). So, any inaccuracies described about the ceremony are likely errors of my memory and not of the actual ceremony.
There are a lot of stories out there with angels, devils, demons and the like, religious groups haven’t particularly targeted them. The criticism of Harry Potter and Pullman (for example) has more to do with the level of their success being newsworthy, than necessarily their content. Usually the criticism comes from those who haven’t read their books. I suspect I’ll remain happily below their radar!
Go to the Dale and Thomas Popcorn website and select another item that you would like to try, leave a comment with the name of that product and a link to the product.
Public Protector Thuli Madonsela has already stopped On-Point Engineering – a private firm partly owned by Malema’s trust – from adjudicating roads and transport tenders in Limpopo.
The feminist/communist hate campaign against the traditional heterosexual nuclear family has been an ongoing thing since the 1960's. The family law courts have been enabling this hate campaign since the introduction of the 1969 Divorce Reform Act and subsequent anti-family legislation, by interpreting the law the way the media led feminist movement wish to and not in the way that Parliament originally intended.
Chelsea will qualify for next season’s Champions League automatically if they defeat Bayern Munich in this season’s final but Di Matteo does not want to risk relying solely on that route and is intent on also finishing in the Premier League’s top four, which Chelsea have done every season since Roman Abramovich bought the club in 2003.
-1 cup milk
446110 Pharmacies & drug stores
Heaven will be a wondrous gallery for a Bohemian. I love the earth immensely, but Black Elk says that he beheld a perfect parallel world and that this one is only a distorted reflection. Can you imagine the aesthetic possibilities? I have dreamed of seeing my friends wearing the exquisite garments of Paradise, and of myself playing in those fields of flowers at dawn. Can you even begin to imagine the divine symphonies, the dancing of the seraphim, or the art in that holy temple near the crystal sea? And most of all, can you imagine seeing the King?
Who would have know,
lift it up… oh!
American Girl Brands is a wholly owned subsidiary of Mattel (NASDAQ:MAT) (www.mattel.com), the world’s leading toy company. Since American Girl’s inception in 1986, the company has devoted its entire business to celebrating the potential of girls ages 3 to 12. American Girl encourages girls to dream, to grow, to aspire, to create, and to imagine through a wide range of engaging and insightful books, age-appropriate and educational products, and unforgettable experiences. In meeting its missionwith a vigilant eye toward quality and service, American Girl has earned theloyal following of millions of girls and the praise and trust of parents and educators. To learn more about American Girl or to request a free catalogue, call 1-800-845-0005, or visit www.americangirl.com.
Girl’s Family has to love Boy’s Family. Boy’s family has to love girl’s family.
The Reverso watch is unique. Over the years, it has managed to appear in new guiseswithout ever losing its soul. Today, wearing a Reverso from the contemporary collections draws the owner into an exclusive world – that of watchmaking history, but also and above all into the sphere of technical perfection and aesthetic refinement.
See you out there!
The most enterprising place in the UK – to identify the town, city, place or area in the country that is best improving economic prospects and encouraging enterprise.
“That must be a heckuva book,” the elderly man said. He stood before me, hand in hand with his lady friend, as they walked the boardwalk on an afternoon constitutional.
1815
3) Has Charlie Sheen made Mel Gibson look like a nice guy after his incoherent ranting of the past week? Now he states that the only way he'll return to the show is if he gets a raise from 1.8 million dollars per episode to 3 million dollars. He figures its it owed to him due to what the show has put him through lately. Delusional antics at its best.
I lost my goals for dance after the ballroom competition, that shall from here out be called “the big disaster”, and focused mostly on social dancing, Lindy Hop and West Coast Swing. During that time, in spite of my ridiculous protests about performing, Tina and I did some incredible showcases together.
The HSTs I stack sometime up to 6 squares, line my ruler up with the 1/4 in line on the corners and cut. This gives me a few extra bonus triangles which I just love!! Look at those puppies, so cute! The 3.5 inch HST - an added bonus does not have any dog ears when cut this way, I just love that. Of course the bonus triangle have to be trimmed.
Thank you very much for a Lovely message
I have seen any combo of spinach and berry salads floating around. I have also seen a plethora...(yes I used a big word...thanks Junior year Rhetoric English...thanks to the teacher who hated me...can't even remember his name)... of strawberry dressing recipes.
1 Prayer Meetin'
My hubby’s silly jokes
It was super quick and so fun. I don't have much need to sew girly stuff at my house, so I love the opportunity to make girl gifts!
Decades of financial repression have resulted in the broad money supply (M2) expanding to 182% of GDP, providing a massive pool of potential liquidity for speculation, while negative real interest rates on deposits encourage savers to seek alternatives. There are sufficient monetary assets to fund a bubble of stupendous magnitude; no excessive loosening is required. From the end of Q3 2006 to its peak in October 2007, the Shanghai Composite Index increased 230%. In the preceding six quarters, M2 growth outpaced nominal GDP growth by less than a percentage point. It was the velocity of money that spiked, not the quantity. Velocity is more difficult for the People’s Bank of China to control, especially with banks’ required reserve ratios already at record highs, and current conditions seem ripe for a bubble.
Watch And Learn: Time Teaches Us How To Recognize Visual Objects – “In work that could aid efforts to develop more brain-like computer vision systems, MIT neuroscientists have tricked the visual brain into confusing one object with another, thereby demonstrating that time teaches us how to recognize objects.
I never had tasted it, so when I saw some in a box on the fish counter I just had to try some.
CHARITATI SACRUM
You know, it’s not hard to grasp how most negative recruiting gets presented. It’s not too tough to figure out how to go after Mark Richt’s hot seat (although I guess SOD owns that now). I get how to throw the sins of roster management in Nick Saban’s direction. Explaining how Paul Johnson’s offense would be the death of any high school quarterback’s NFL dreams would be a breeze.
*Experience with MVS/TSO operating systems; and/or equivalent experience with another mainframe operating system.
The Types
Higson is gritty and violent and scary. On the first page, a little kid gets taken by adults, thrown in a sack to be eaten later. And it's all downhill from there. If you want to be scared? Read this book.
In the short term, it would be great if my membership with the gym helped me tone my body (swimsuit season is coming up rather soon.) More importantly, however, I am hoping that this experience will encourage me to continue a lifelong commitment to my own health and physical fitness. As terribly cheesy as it sounds, I am actually excited to monitor my development as I continue to work out. This is certainly a new challenge for me, but I look forward to developing new fitness skills for a healthier life.
Monday, 9:15 a.m.: become an SEC attorney
In this order, or the order described in your breadmaker manual, place in your breadmaker:
she put a smile on my face this morning
Pepperoni/Mozzarella
WASHINGTON – Michelle Obama told a group of curious kids visiting the White House Thursday about her daughter Malia’s most frequent question about Dad’s job: What’s he doing to help tigers?
~ I played quizzo afterwards with my brother and sister Alicia. We did so terrible it was almost embarrassing.
Okay, enough rambling, I need to finish two more exams before I’m home free for a week. Spring semester begins a week after winter semester is over.
4. There was a common language. The influence of French in the South continues to this day – and there are of course many Hispanic media channels and communities. But if you go to the US in 2011, even though they use odd words for pavements, prostitutes, rubbers and hello, 97% of the population has English as a first or fluent language
Natalie tells us in this latest appearance that she likes writing. It will be fascinating to see where that takes her in the future as she settles down and moves to establish - as no doubt she will - a career in the public sphere. Will she go commercial? Will she enter public life in some other way? Politics? TV? Right now the settings on her existential video deck are set to 'pause'. Just wait to see the reaction when she finally hits 'play' again.
At this visit, we found out that she had gained a pound in the last 6 weeks. She is now tipping the scales at 29 pounds and is roughly 37 inches, bringing her BMI to 54%. This is amazing news! 50% is average or median for her height and weight combined, and is compared to other children in her age group. 54% is completely proportionate! I am so happy with that number!
"Give thanks in all circumstances; for this is the will of God in Christ Jesus for you." 1 Thessalonians 5:18 (NIV)
We then walked back to the hotel where we chilled out and watched Black Hawk Down on HBO, it was a good relaxing day after the crazy last 2 weeks in china!
Setting the pace for creativity will manage your time more effectively. Leaving room in the day for trial and error accounts will be less stressful and more successful.
The 2012 election year has been filled with political ads across the country vying for political power in all three levels of Government: White HOuse, House of Representatives, and Senate. Many will say that this election year is not about race that it’s about the American people, but those same people will cast their vote only to remove the country’s first Black president. These similar acts of voting are playing out across the country. Very few black democrats or republicans have even made it through the initial voting to make it to the primaries and now this trend has nearly removed all black senators from the Senate.
-When we polled Nevada in April Pawlenty was at anywhere from 7-10% in the various iterations of the field that we tested. Now he's all the way down at 1%. Clearly whatever support he was showing then was quite soft and has dissipated as other candidates- Perry, Bachmann, even Cain- have proved to be more compelling to the GOP electorate. I think there's a general perception nationally that Pawlenty is failing to gain support but in Nevada he's actively losing it.
We went to our first Garden Show this past weekend (the Flower and Garden Show in Hartford, CT). We thought it'd be a good way to get out of the house and maybe get some ideas for a patio that we'd like to put in (DIY of course!) someday.
Big Bottoms
4. In what kind of place do I feel most at home? What shapes and textures give me comfort, or discomfort?
Nutritious meals for two adults and two kids can be prepared for just over $500 a month, said Robert Post, the deputy director for the U.S. Department of Agriculture's Center for Nutrition Policy and Promotion. A single person can get by with a monthly food budget of about $225 a month.
This one stood out like a sentinel and was not messing around. It was maybe 50-100 feet tall over a very short distance. The people who tried to run it, moved slower then the ones power hiking it. Once we got to the top, we were treated to amazing panoramas of the entire southernSawatch Range from Harvard all the way to Tabeguache and Shavano on the southern end of the range. The trail dropped rapidly again, turning just enough to show us that this wall hill thing was going to repeat. Each hill brought the runners to a hike speed, but each time the top offered the amazing views, and yet another downhill. To give a sense, it was like running hill repeats at Ruby Hill inDenverbut at 9,000ft during a race and with better views! Just when I felt like I was in a groove, we came to the top of the last hill in the rollercoaster and saw the second aid station.
We're going to sew those on under your zigzag stitching at the top of the pouch. I left about 1/2" from the top then sewed it on, stitching 1/8" away from the edge of the strip, sewing the top first then the bottom. I found it was much easier to do this with the pouch inside out (stitching inside). Remember not to stitch the two small side edges down, just the top and bottom.
"go that way, go this way, go around, go over".
By the end of a fairly long night they had fallen in love with – wait for it – Kwak and Innes & Gunn. Now that’s a step up from VB and Pure Blonde! So much so, in fact, that they wanted to buy a slab of I&G from us then and there to take away. They were heading up to Mildura to spend the holidays on a houseboat on the Murray River and reckoned that a 6.2% Oak Aged Scottish beer was just the thing for lazy care-free days floating along a river and contemplating life.
FINE!
This is question, from our Managed Care Leadership Survey, stirs strong opinions from providers, payers and others.
placed carrots, in the second she placed eggs, and in the last she placed
Has man changed? Have we learned from history? Do men even learn when God seeks to instruct them? The human race continues to make the same mistakes over and over again. Sure, they had a climate change in Noah’s day and there wasn’t a thing anyone could do about it. And it wasn’t caused by an overabundance of gas pollution either.
(click for sharper image)
And the winning numbers are: 46, 23, 38, 4 and 2. The winning ticket was bought in Maryland. My dad lives in Maryland at the moment, so there is still hope. Unfortunately, he hasn’t called us yet, screaming on the phone about being a multimillionaire, so I am skeptical. Perhaps he fell asleep on the sofa, which is not that unusual.
gingham ribbon
Thanks.
Using first a technique called "poublaison" (a kind of tape loop) [2011 NOTE:ACTUALLY PUBLISON, A MACHINE THAT COMBINES SAMPLING AND EFFECTS) and now straightforward sampling with an Akai 900, Azar takes raw material (a Meters guitar lick, an ancient R&B drum sound, a string of call-and-response) and assembles a kind of Frankenstein dance monster out of funk-limbs that don't belong together. Check out the Hurby's Machine sampler of his creations. The different grooves almost, but don't quite fit – hence the friction, the rub, that makes the music so sensual, in comparison with the sado-masochistic jackhammer rhythms of previous hip hop.
That means that Daniel, whose mom Carolyn entered on his behalf and Helene, whose Mom Suzie entered on her behalf, are the Recipients for Mission 2. Congratulations to you both. Your iPads are going to be wrapped up today and shipped out if we can hear back from you and get all of your requested information. E-mails have been sent to you both right after this blog was published.
Remez Sasson offers these insights on what mind chatter is :
The interface here looks strikingly similar to the popular gmail. Signing up for a free account here is quite similar as well. A left-hand talk bar is the place to begin entering your information and customizing this tool to your needs. There are a number of items to input, such as: gender, ethnicity, blood type, age, etc. An extensive list of medical conditions and symptoms follows this. You can search through an alphabetical list or begin typing a condition and Google Health will make suggestions as you go. The same goes for medications, allergies, medical procedures, test results, and immunizations.
Have a great holiday and thanks for reading.
I am eyes of darkness, stalking silently
We are not under the law because of the work of Jesus Christ on the cross. This is seen in Colossians 2:14.
Once again we were blessed! I cannot tell you how many times in my life I have been slipped $10 or $20 by a giving person or how many times I have gotten a phone call or been chatting with someone who has said "Hey I am getting rid of this ________, are you interested?" Both of these things just happened to me.
Wealth redistribution is no solution to poverty, political analyst Moeletsi Mbeki told a conference on the world economy in Johannesburg on Tuesday.
Came back to our hotel and I decided a hot tub was a good idea, as I wandered across the parking lot to the hot tub a little breeze picked up and I could hear the coyotes calling.
Meanwhile, Rocking In The Free World................
I don't know how, but I had a feeling that I needed to make something for my BFF, in Maryland. Julie and I have been friends since we were 8 years old and have stayed close since then even though we are 3000 miles apart. No matter what happens we are always there for one another.
Curators can’t do that. They can’t show people they like again, they have to show something new. They have to show to the public taste. They have to be fair and diverse and pretty soon no one gives a damn about anything.
I get very excited when it's time for this beer to come out. I fell in love with it the first time I drank it and continue to enjoy it. It's such a beautiful expression of hop flavor and aroma without a ton of hop bitterness. I love bitter beers, but really dig a beer that can showcase hops like this one does. It's probably my favorite summer beer.
Birthplace:
3 reflects
Janus Publishing’s third option for authors is their Self-Publishing service.
I hope everyone enjoyed their weekend - here in Minnesota, we were blessed with an amazing weekend of 40+ degree, sunny weather. Is it really February?! It has been such a mild winter.... no complaints from this sun-loving girl!
for my life. I have a wonderful family, dear friends
Within this bizarre, false dishonest world which has formed around us, lies are revered and wildly applauded, yet it is entirely possible to be prosecuted for no more than telling the truth.
FRIENDS’ RATINGS: Metinee liked it.
-There were lots and lots of great talks and presentations. My favorites were Michael's GLBT discussion (I'm pretty sure I breathed a sigh of relief when I saw that on the schedule - I've felt inexplicably funny about being out in the unschooling community); Kathryn and Erika's "Even More Different" talk, which I've already mentioned here; Eli and Idzie's "Untraditional Adult Paths" discussion, which left me feeling way more confident about my desire not to work for someone else; and Dayna Martin's "Renegade Parenting" speech, which included a great message about looking for the needs that are causing people's behavior - not just in kids, but in all the people you deal with.
Emma Tupper is a dedicated lawyer with a bright future. But when she takes a month-long leave of absence to go on an African vacation, she ends up facing unexpected consequences. After she falls ill and spends six months trapped in a remote village thanks to a devastating earthquake, Emma returns home to discover that her friends, boyfriend, and colleagues thought she was dead and that her life has moved on without her.
mention us in your post with a link back
In an ideal world, every client would want us to work creatively and push the boundaries. In reality, most organizations have specific needs that don’t always fit into the most creative package. We respect this, but we also believe that we need to push ourselves creatively to be able to grow and keep ourselves engaged. Our independent work allows us to spend as much time as we need on a project and think outside the box.
4 thinking
In the crowd the trembling was real, especially after another dispatch brought news that Burton had lacked Pell’s precision and missed a penalty, meaning B arnet still needed only one goal to make a Hereford win an agonising superfluity.
5 -GTTACGGTCTGTCCCATGATCTC-3) were specific to the 5 terminus of VP62 gag. The VP62 nested PCR assay was foundto be capable of detecting 10 plasmids diluted in 600 ng of uninfected LNCaP DNA in 3 of 3 samples and 1 plasmid in 600 ng of uninfected LNCaP DNA in 1 of 3 samples (data not shown).
20-something: God, I’m fat. I just won’t eat today.
Some of you may already know that my publisher, Frances Lincoln Children's Books are no longer going to be publishing Young Adult books. This decision has been taken by Quarto, the company that took over FLCB and parent company Frances Lincoln in August.
La Luna
Aldioxa – See Allantoin.
Mix all your ingredients together until the lumps have disappeared. Let the mix sit for about 5 minutes before you cook with it. I always let it sit and then I stir it again just before I cook.
The grueling months of training are finally over!! This week, I get to eat as many carbs as I want, wear flats, do a few light jogs and do some yoga. Sunday morning's forecast is perfect - a low of 54 and high of 63 degrees. I can already taste the salty air coming off the San Francisco Bay.
The Greenaways, Delia and Raymond, 21 and 23 respectively, have been joined in holy wedlock for less than a year. It is perhaps little wonder therefore that Raymond, no chorister himself, feels some annoyance at this loss of connubial evenings. He complains but of course he knows the answer.
It is not within the power of the town planner to alter the prejudices of people, or to prevent entirely the growing up of the East End and West End in a town ; but a good deal may be done in this direction by care and forethought ; certainly within limits, more or less wide, there is no difficulty in mingling houses of different sizes. There is nothing whatever in the prejudices of people to justify the covering of large areas with houses of exactly the same size and type.
Heaven only knows.... I'll report back later....
Under the proposed MTA plan, the cost of an unlimited monthly Metrocard would increase nearly 17%, from $89 to $104. Riders would have the option of opting for a less expensive $99 card with a maximum number of trips limited to 90. The MTA has presented this proposal as progressive, noting the difference in income between riders who purchase the pay-per-ride Metrocards and the unlimited weekly cards, and those who purchase the 30-day pass. I would say that the board has a faulty understanding of wealth when they consider an individual making $63,000 annually in New York City comfortably able to afford a 17% fare hike. The monthly unlimited card has always been the most affordable option on a day-to-day basis; those who use public transportation daily and choose day-to-day or weekly Metrocards are clearly purchasing their cards with the money in their pocket. I agree that the MTA should keep the needs of New York’s working-class citizens primary in their consideration, but a truly progressive increase would not harshly punish the majority of middle-class New Yorkers.
My client has a really tiny eating area in his kitchen, so we decided a small table and banquette with a couple of additional chairs would be a great space-saver.
Side Door Man by The Grannies
A photojournalist in theory, and photographers please chime in if I’m wrong, will capture the moments of the day and not have people pose for them. You won’t be recreating your cake cutting or bouquet toss, the photographer will have captured it as it was happening.
o Extortion
she says the Bible is all that she reads and prefers that I not use profanity
File Formats, JPGs and DPI Most point-&-shoot cameras save their images as JPGs. These days, JPGs work well for both print media and the web so there's seldom a need to convert your photos into alternate formats. However, you do need to take some care in saving your jpgs if you want to maintain your photos' quality.
The repetitive chords the Stooges played, which come off as amateurish at first, mask the primal beauty of their music. It's in that spirit that Singapore Sling play their tunes, although they sound more like J&MC without the catchy hooks.
Hint: "pounding" is really not what you want to do. You want to "sweep" out from the center. Hit and sweep. You are really pulling the meat, not pounding it. You want a nice thin, even breast that will cook quickly and evenly.
Incidentally, the book is not 'By Yukkopedia', it's by me. As for 'given you a credit of writing', that means reproduced the title page. (This book has been taken down by scribd.com in compliance with a take-down notice.)
Second, by overwhelmingly popular demand, editor Erin Molta's visit to our little corner of the blogosphere will be a Q&A, possibly divided into more than one post, so please check the comments from Wednesday's post to see the questions currently on the table, and add any additional questions here when you think of them (or email me :)) There is not yet a set date for this extravaganza, but you can be sure I'll let you know! :)
You are loved (breathe out)
Go in peace.
And, I learned I was FIV positive.
Personally..I don’t need a pastor who writes best-selling books. Or one who used to star in the old comedy sitcom. Or the one who started out on Broadway then decided to be a pastor. And who now pastors a church with 1000000000 members. I need a pastor who prays and pleads the blood of Jesus Christ. I remember them well.
In 2009, the majority of South Africans once again gave the ANC the mandate through their votes to effectively manage the country’s resources not only to overcome the country’s socioeconomic challenges but also to create an enabling environment for future leaders and generations to successfully achieve the country’s vision of a non-racial coherence and prosperity.
Consequently (low expectations often bring surprises!), I found those pages moved along more quickly than I anticipated. And it's important to pay attention to them, because they form a framework that neatly brings Larsson's story full circle.
‘It can lead to mistaken identities’ – by Andrew Sagayam – Monday, March 26, 2012 – 14:50
I think of what Terri Jo and Katherine must have felt like as they came driving in through the camp gates those second years, with their cabin assignments in their hands, reading that I was going to be in their cabin...again. I try and imagine the dread they must have felt knowing what the next two weeks held in store for them. Some kids hate going to camp because of the heat or the mosquitoes. These girls hated camp because of me and my all-too-willing friends and our totally misguided belief that we were somehow superior to them.
I know, I know... For some of you it's already here. Don't rub it in! Hahaha!
You deserted the Rock, who fathered you; you forgot the God who gave you birth. Deuteronomy 32:18
So long lives this, and this gives life to thee.
“No?” Jack cried. He paced around the room. “What do you mean no?”
I'm not stopping. The polished draft for Stopover at the Backworlds' Edge should be done by the end of the year. Then it goes through a second coat of polish. Refining, adding some new detail, and making a few changes per my local crit group. I redid its cover, too. Mostly because I noticed video gal and I had a typo in the title -- which I didn't notice for several months. The apostrophe goes after the s in Backworlds, not before. But now I think I might release Stopover in paperback, too, which means redoing the cover again. That's OK. I'll manage.
The worst case scenario is that both the San Andreas and northwest coast subduction zone release simultaneously, creating a meg-quake of unprecedented proportions!
These women could then be closely monitored and offered pre-emptive treatment, such as surgery.
They returned one, the SNP Group leader Allison Hunter.
But Jenna is my expat twin..
You can argue its pure coincidence, but I think not. The old proverb “all good things come in threes” comes to mind when discussing this auspicious occurrence and Grimes latest album Visions, which was also released on January 31, 2012, proves my point. This dream pop damsel first came to my attention when she toured with one of my favorite singers Lykke Li last year. Recently, my awesome friend Amy reintroduced Grimes to me and I couldn’t be happier.
avoid being with colleagues and try and include someone who knew the layout of the building”.
The man became a multi-millionaire, running companies which specialised in asset stripping and hedge funds. His business background is firmly among the people who caused the financial crisis of 2008, the consequences of which are still reverberating around the globe.
- There will be more guns stolen because citizens don't have weapon retention training.
If I can get everything in order, I will go back this fall, because if I’m serious about getting married, and actively meeting guys and getting myself out there, then it’s only a matter of time. Only a matter of time. It’s wise to get my education completed now – it looks like I have six semesters left – so that I will graduate around the same time I get married. I don’t want to put it off and end up doing it after the kids grow up. I would rather do it now, while it’s the most do-able.
It’s the perfect time to get a diary – it’s the start of a year, it’s a great time for new-years resolutions, and the diaries are on special! What are you waiting for?
The world and the church are not one and the same. Yet this is what TBN and other so-called religious programs try to make it be.
When I am misunderstood, you play the tunes that remind me of who I am and always will be.
Holding on to the world
"What is consistent here is that these are very static scenarios. You're not going to see the drone going from one end of downtown to the next following a police pursuit," Whitcomb says.
Also, when the fundamental maxim of network ethics speaks of ‘your networks’, ‘your’ should be understood to mean all the networks in your world, if in differing degrees. For in fact, all networks are your networks, for each and every network is a refraction of all the others with which it is related. That said, as Whitehead has argued, because there is extension within the universe, giving rise to time and space, each entity in the universe is ‘ranked’ in ‘relevance’ to each other by the very structure of the universe itself. Mars is more relevant to me than Alpha Centuri, for example. And so, while both are still ‘my networks’, the one which is more relevant to me is mine in a stronger sense.
Mark my words; it is ‘The Living God of Israel’ Himself who is the one positioning and aligning His people for the days that lay ahead, those that know me will testify to that fact, so you have already lost this modern Jihad in Great Britain before it has even truly started, just like your loses throughout history.
including the specialty Nestabling™ line along with the newly released
With the result that we would have found ourselves with five hectares for which we have no use at a vastly over rated price.....and for a neighbour we would have had The Neighbour.....busy building himself a house with our money on the three hectares we had assumed we had bought!
Alphabet Writing: Quick Prompts From A to Z by Erin of Small Types: "Get students' pencils moving and their creativity flowing with these short alphabet-themed writing prompts. Students can write notes to friends, make lists, turn alphabet letters into main characters and describe the details in fictional adventures--All corresponding to the letters of the alphabet. (Includes five prompts for each letter to suit different levels and interests.)"
And in the midst of God’s people, there is one who is whispering “No! Never!”.
I adapted my muesli recipe from a friend's and it tends to change every time I make it. Basically I warm some honey, golden syrup and butter in a sauce pan. Throw a few cups of oats in a bowl, add nuts/seeds/spices that you like then mix thru the syrupy mix. Lay out on a baking tray and bake at about 160 for 5-10 min until toasty brown. Give a stir and pop back in for a bit.
A note of positivity: “Wait til six o’clock tonight,” says a girl. “We’ll show them then.” There’s gonna be a protest. I suggest maybe tomorrow at six, so there’s more time to build for it. Then a man in a camouflage jacket says: “We’ll have another one at six tomorrow so.” It takes me back four or five months. The Occupy attitude, provoking equal parts admiration and frustration.
Once the debris clears I will be back on rummage mode and hopefully have a little give-away for you next week. But it's time for our morning stroll so we will catch up with you all tomorrow over at Penny Black Saturday for another fab challenge and woohooo yummy prizes.
My kids really enjoyed how I modelled how to write those two sentences and were eager to get in and try it for themselves. They sure are a sucker for colour ink and laminate because when I brought out these babies
We'd like to say a mahoosive thank you to our fabulous sponsors and all of you who supported our challenges throughout the last year. It's been a pleasure to visit each of you, see your wonderful creations and interprations of our weekly themes.
And then I got busy:
First few attempts were a massive fail. A failure so faily, I had to sit down in the water and have a cry. I threw a tantrum, I really did. I was so frustrated and in so much pain I just wanted to quit the sport altogether (blasphemy I know!). But then that little Mexican with the gun shook his head condescendingly and I had a flash of the tree…. and then…. I rode with my kite up high, I angled my board upwind more and more and more until I had all three tips in my head: board, shoulder, head…. I looked behind me and…. LANDED A BACKROLL!
HELLLOOOOO! I finally came up for air!! I don't know if you have this same thing in the US but here there is this big push for fiscal year end which is March 31 and all the government funding must be reported and closed off. This means for the last few weeks I have been up late working (til midnight most nights) and into the office early. Wrapping up projects, finalizing reports, organizing all the financials. Its been crazy. AND to top it off the weather has sucked big time so hasn't been noteworthy outfit-wise at all. Basically I have just been grabbing whatever is in front of me in the closet and head to work.
UPDATE: 6th September, 2011. The Irish Independent today carries an article by Roisin Burke, a journalist at the Sunday Independent Business Desk which cites sources and insiders. Notwithstanding the credibility of said sources, the article does carry detailed claims, that the bill will be introduced in “October/late November” and whilst in line with Aine Coffey’s article in the Sunday Times in July 2011 there is an important new claim – “A lease would be judged on a standalone basis. “For example, if you have 12 shops across Ireland and 10 of them are doing quite well, but say two of them are crucifying you because of off-the-wall rent, you should be able to get a review on the basis of those two individual stores and not on the basis of your overall balance sheet,” the insider said.”. If true, conceivably this could mean a retailer with vast disposable means might be able to secure a revision to his lease, as long as the enterprise subject to the lease was confronting with at present unquantified financial distress.
Parked, walked through city walk, and followed the signs to the start…
The men include a senior banker, a company director, a senior vice-president of a private company, lawyers, a senior police officer, a primary school principal who is married with a child as well as a scholarship recipient.
This was NOT what I wanted to hear and it felt like it kept getting worse. We would not be able to continue using our donor unless we went through several thousand dollars of tests (again) and processing to get his semen screened, cleaned and stored at a cryobank. With IUI, a thawed vial of semen would be placed directly into my uterus at the time of ovulation and FDA regulations keep us from doing that with fresh semen from our donor with our doctor’s assistance. With IVF, we would harvest some of my eggs, fertilize them in a lab and put a few of the “good ones” back in to hope that they stick. That’s not an option using our donor’s fresh semen either.
you always play.
grilling out
Then it was time for me to leave. The Teacher told me I could stay if I would feel better, but I was ready to find out if she would be going to school or not. At this point I told her Mommy was leaving and that I would be back. She started crying. The Teacher told me, "She will be ok". Yes in "normal" circumstances I would expect a child to be ok, but these are uncharted waters. When is really the right time? I really thought that it was going to not be now. Even when I go to the grocery store and she stays with Mike, when I come back she acts like I have been gone for a week. She runs to me yelling"Mommy" and hugs me. So I walked out the door. And you know what happened next? I started crying. Here I am surrounded by all of these young moms and I am crying. They are all telling me it will be ok. I can hear her crying and I wait. After just a few minutes one of the Moms looks in the window for me and tells me that she is sitting on the teacher's lap and is not crying. I wait a little longer and she is still ok. So I leave after telling the director to call me if she starts crying again. I did some shopping close by so that I could be back in 5 minutes.
1 can rinsed/drained chickpeas or about 2 cups cooked chickpeas
We find Jesus constantly responding to the other's point of view rather than to his words: for example, Matthew 19:3-9,16-22; 21:23-27; 22:15-46; John 8:2-11.
But this particular word has divided my community for far too fucking long.
"A tie is an extension of you and a reflection of your personality.”
He compared it classic films like ‘Raging Bull’ in which boxer Jake LaMotta played by Robert de Niro talks to himself in the mirror before the screen goes black with a quote from The Bible on screen.
The review: almost exactly like a regular taco. The Doritos fake cheese flavor isn’t strong enough to compete with the fake meat and vegetables in the taco. So you get a tiny pre and aftertaste of Doritos, but that’s about it. The much bigger difference is that the shell starts breaking apart as you eat it because the shell thinner and flimsier.
But me? I am a princess because I said “Yes” to the King. He pursued me. He laid down His life for me. He offered His hand, and I took it.
bounce to “Ach du Lieber Augustine,”
I have gone on vacations where the majority of my wardrobe has been me-made
As attractive as the job prospects of moving abroad and the potential life experiences of an expat may sound, many expats living abroad will know the reality that expat life is not all glamour.
:: our first port of call was on the Dutch side of St Maartens
Hypnosis can double the success of IVF treatment, researchers have claimed. A team from Soroka University, Israel, found 28% of women in the group who were hypnotised became pregnant, compared with 14% of those who were not. The study of 185 women was presented to the European Society of Human Reproduction and Embryology conference in Berlin.
It's true that there are some fortunate souls who excel in this area, bringing not only satisfaction to those who engage them but creating and sustaining an income stream that, if not constant, is at least relatively stable and predictable. Many others, it seems, are only really dabbling in mediation as a means of keeping their hands in, retaining their sanity and temporising until something better comes up.
Leap into a bit of happily every after with this Valentine's Day themed digital taggers kit. It's full of frogs, and fantasy and forever love!
Requirements:
For me, Deadlocked was a thrilling read. Some fans are exasperated with the series, but not me. Expect to have some questions answered, but not everything will be revealed. The ending rocked my world. Sookie has balls. BALLS! She makes an irrevocable decision in Deadlocked that will leave you in awe if not begging for more. The ending alone, put this book at a 4.
Now, storing the computer in a high place is not the same as removing his computer privileges as punishment. He still gets to use the computer. I sit with him while he explores the computer. I help him explore it and use it gently. I encourage him to use a different computer, an old, sturdy desktop, when I can't sit with him. He will continue to learn about the keys and why they are important.
Do you think that the far-sighted Joseph Bazalgette had realised that his enormous sewer would one day be used as a grandstand for a construction project, of which I’m sure he would have proud? Obviously not, but with so many things he did, he got them absolutely right. And right for possibly a thousand years!
The cost of the study of the study of the studies was not available from the GAO.
Our spelling quizzes are on Thursday and kids don't get their new words until Friday, so on Thursday, I have included the option of writing a response to the book they have been reading all week. This can look like any of the following:
Create everyday! Not just from the intellect, but from the subtle vibrations of a heart that is connected with the Divine flow of what moves within. It is not difficult! Just breathe and feel! Release and allow the child of the heart to dance in the field of wonderment that surrounds and enfolds us at all times! If there is any heaviness or dark mood, allow yourselves to feel the “structure” or “geometry” of any tightness or pain associated with it in the body and then give deep permission to move and breathe, dance and tone in ways that helps to “evolve” your relationship with it.
“JUNSU!!!!” Yoochun awake with panting. ‘Nightmare…’ He look around his bedroom. He get up and went to kitchen.
kendisi verdi toprağa, Ahmet’imiz. Tek başına.”
Husbands will pay a modest bride price, but no less than one gram of gold (which Abdullahi wants to go to the bride but usually goes to her family). The state will also pay all wedding expenses.
In the viewing, Rissad had entered the caves leading to the Abyss through a tower that would have seemed modest by the standards of its time, but was now a monolith as daunting as any pre-Crash ruin. Brown and yellow brickwork quickly gave way to concrete and glass as the buildings reared up, higher and higher with each crossroads. Every concrete monster showed the scars of the Realmcrash, their glass cracked or missing, some leaning towards their neighbours, one whose upper storeys had collapsed leaving a shape like an imploring hand, reaching skywards in desperation.
Thank you for your laughter. It's one of the most beautiful sounds in the universe to me.
Have a wonderful weekend, friends.
In January of 2007, it came back with a vengeance. My luekocyte, lymphocyte, and monocyte counts were all elevated, and my red cell count was too low. I had kidney and intestinal involvement and lung, heart, and liver involvement soon followed. My blood inflammation levels were through the roof. To keep my levels as close to normal as possible, I was started on two chemo shots a week, along with plaquenil (an anti-malaria drug) and a slew of others. I was back to using forearm crutches and a cane. I could hardly get out of bed. Despite how sick I was, I still made sure I cooked supper for my family every night. I swelled up from the shots and all the inflammation. I didn’t recognize the person in the mirror. I started planning my own funeral, convinced I would not survive. There were days my children were afraid to go to school and leave me alone. They feared I would need help and no one would be there, and some days they feared I would die. Water therapy is primarily the only kind of therapy that is productive for me now.
Thanks so much for stopping by! I can't wait to see everyone's cloud creations! Have a great day!
2) Would you pay for a monthly online briefing on the latest news and events in the field? Again it would have guest expert speakers, and it would be available at an annual fee. It would be perhaps webinar style, probably about an hour long, with Q&A time built in.
What are you dealing with? The next set of questions ask you to identify what substances are kept on your property and how they are stored and used. Those covered include oils, chemicals, solvents, radioactive material etc.
The Possible- Home remedy and appreciation
We held our fifth Google Summer of Code meetup in the Moratuwa, Sri Lanka area on March 17th. We had enormous support from the Department of Computer Science & Engineering staff at the University of Moratuwa to make it a full scale session covering many of the aspects of the program that are important to students. We had almost 150 students (a record high) in the morning introductory sessions and around 40 students during the afternoon sessions that were geared more toward second and third year university students.
Today, "RIP Kurt Cobain" trended on Twitter. Seventeen years ago, he shot himself in the head and ended his life. He left behind a wife, a baby daughter, two bandmates who suddenly had to make new career plans for themselves, and a few CDs' worth of terrific music, just barely enough for a legacy. I put the Nirvana VEVO channel on at work, when I could, just to remember.
Ah god, I got it. I rode on the right bus but to opposite direction. The place I wanted to go was at the opposite of this bus route. Terribly, 1 hour trip became 3 hours, and in this horrible roller coster. Say no more!!
The store attached to his house confronted the street corner,
One of them is his last, the unfinished Mystery of Edwin Drood and by great good fortune, this was also adapted by TV, in two installments last week.
In laboratory studies, vitamins such as A, C and E, as well as compounds such as isothiocyanates and dithiolthiones found in broccoli, cauliflower, and cabbage, and beta-carotene found in carrots, tomatoes, and salad greens, have been shown to protect against cancer.
There is no sweeter smell than the smell of grace in Christ Jesus, and it is you and I that are the recipients of that grace. In Christ, we are the ointment poured out at Calvary, dipped in His blood and left as a sweet odor to the Father and those around us as we live our lives redeemed by love.
With girls who have dreams itself, makes their character well respected. Despite living in districts that bans idols and mass media with similar influences, young girls dared to dream with their lives on stake. The show’s plot is surprising, yet easy digestible / acceptable, and at least they are able to support it with their context itself.
You recently offered your two cents on Amateur Mixed Martial Arts, and I couldn’t disagree more. I was disappointed with your take.
The link gadget will close on February 28th at 11.59pm CST.
Protests were also organized in college towns such as Amherst, Massachusetts, and Ann Arbor, Michigan, to Los Angeles, Houston and Philadelphia.
For those who have known me and my political beliefs, I expect you have probably seen this one coming from a mile off. After months of publicly criticising the Coalition government’s authoritarian tax-‘n’-spend policies, I’ve finally defected to UKIP, the one political party in the UK that actually wants to reduce the size of government.
The top women would gather for one last go ‘round in the Diamond League final in Brussels with Uceny getting redemption, a world leader, and a new PR with a 4:00.06 win over all of the principals from Daegu, and the season, in tow – taking us to the top five rankings.
On another note, I spent the evening creating a website and blog for my high schoolers. I am tickled with excitement. I have so many ideas for next year, and I am ready for a chance to have a clean slate.
I only advertise products that are appropriate for me and my family. I'm a stay at home mom of 6 kids. My kids ages are 2, 4, 7, 9, 12 & 13. Toys, computer/phone/camera stuff, restaurants and vacation destinations suitable for large families, children's and women's clothing, kid friendly websites and tv shows, and baby and personal healthcare products are some of the things I'm interested in advertising and/or reviewing. Because I just don't have time to read right now, I don't review books.
I only have two meals to show, I forgot to do dinner.
Dance me to the children who are asking to be born
“I can’t see why the judge cannot finish writing his grounds. It has been two years already. I have raised the issue in Parliament but just received a written reply, which is pointless,” Karpal had told reporters.
If you have a dream to become an actor/actress in this industry, live that dream, push yourself to success and accomplish your dreams/goals. Seek workshops, advice, diplomas, It’s not easy in this industry so you have to work hard and stay on top of things. Start out as an extra and build your career from there. Dreams come true so don’t let them die out.
Harry is responding to the new cancer drug and feels much better but the brain disorder, Normal Pressure Hydrocephalus, is affecting his memory, moods and often walking, making things hard for him and everyone else. He has recently had to give up driving and we managed to sell the car over the weekend to some friends.
Taxes should not be a “buffet” where you get to pick and choose what you like and don’t like. It is supposed to be a just and equal system. Which is preposterous as it is based on penalizing those who are more successful –not quite sure how that is just or equal but we will deal with that later.
NOTE: I received this book from Zondervan for free in exchange for a review and was under no obligation to provide a favorable one. The thoughts and words expressed in this review are my own.
I also have been wanting a bowl to put by my kitchen sink to hold the scrub brush for dish washing ever since I saw one at my mother-in-law's one day when I was doing dishes.
"No, it's really not."
Others are playing football, caught in mid stride or simply standing idol and laughing.
It usually starts with the hounds; Chevy has to remind me he was once a therapy dog, and crawl his massive frame into my lap. Whistler will chase him away, but wants to either have me pet him or sit very, very near me; as in nearly knocking me over. Milarepa just wants to make sure my face is clean, and will therefore lick every bit of dirt, real and imagined, off.
However, I see this as an opportunity to get exploring in earnest in order to fill up all 15 nomination slots. I’m not assigning a timetable to this but I am motivated to spread the blog button joy. For now, I will content myself with awarding the blog button to bloggers whose updates I look forward to and read on as regular a basis as I read anything online. Enjoy!
A good credit record will help you with a massage therapist in rehabilitative therapy clinics; sports, orthopedic, and chiropractic offices; hospitals and nursing homes; or in colleges and schools but also in upcoming sectors of life is definitely of the dominos bismarck north dakota as chemistry, anatomy, physiology, pathology, kinesiology, and sometimes nutrition. You can really enjoy all the dominos bismarck north dakota that the dominos bismarck north dakota of missing money websites don't have accurate data, and even the dominos bismarck north dakota, lignite and natural gas are just few of the entire family.
Sabbaba has so many vegan options, you can get them in a pita or in a bowl and their hot chips are vegan too. I'm surprised I haven't blogged about it before as it was one of the first places I met up with other Sydney vegans, many years ago :)
When the cancer came we had to have one of your toes amputated. We wrapped a Walmart bag around your foot and taped it around your leg so you wouldn’t get it wet when you went out to do your business. You tried to look dignified..and failed. But you endured. You got older, slower, heavier…sicker.
I closed it, waiting for the screams
I stopped doing Weight Watchers that first time when I was unemployed and literally couldn’t afford to go to meetings. That was a mistake. An unavoidable mistake, but a mistake non-the-less. I thought “I know the system, I can just keep tracking and weigh my self at home… and it’ll be fine.” And it was, for about a month.
“Are you a FAN of theirs??” says the Cat Lady, in an ominous voice.
Bake for about 14-18 minutes. Allow to cool for 20-30 minutes prior to removing from pan.
Happy Father's Day to all you Dads out there, I hope you are having a most marvellous day!
After about page 70, I couldn't do it anymore and I committed the cardinal sin of flipping through it to just see what happens, and even that was awful. The storyline only got worse. The funny thing was that I could tell by the wear of the book that no one else that had checked the book out had finished it either.
I'm not sure whether I will collect the whole set. I kind of doubt it.
I couln’t resist throwing in some maple sugar, maple syrup and pecans as well, sorry, I just can’t help it .They are moist, tasty and simply delicious ! You really should have one. Or two.
FAMILY FITNESS TOGETHER PROGRAM
Pours a clear, yet robust Blood Orange color with a champagne like head that dissipates quickly to sturdy ring. The nose is complex - sour, dry cherry, tart, dusty with hints of wood, florals and some pale malt. The taste is all about cherry, but not overwhelmingly so. It starts out with tart cherry and light oak. Slightly sweet grain notes come next and transition into a finish full of florals and tannins.
I want the space where I write to be a haven. Much like I feel God calling me to create a haven for my family in our home, I feel He's calling me to carve out an online space for other moms and homemakers to find vision, rest and peace. He has placed a call on my life to ministry to other moms and homemakers, and while a large piece of that actually takes place around the table in my home, I believe part of it will be shared in the space where I write. And though I'm still putting together a few of the pieces, I guess I can reveal that I'm going to be moving to a new blog home soon that will sort of culminate this vision for ministry called 'this shared life'.
The card base is krafty and I used just some red for matting the main layer. I added some olive seam binding ribbon and a little tag with some twine. The PEACE word comes in our Holiday Sentiments set but this stamp actually comes with the Sending Winter Hugs sentiment as well and the whole thing is only $6! Lastly I added some Stardust Stickles to sparkle him up!!
We got worrying about what Morrisey does for Christmas.
- my friend Ashleigh and I got into a fight while were pretending to be a penguins, but we stayed in character as we were fighting. bahaha
Oh, little ones. i sigh that this is my generation...
I guess it is good to keep the writing skills fresh, but also, I think “how to be a writer-rules” depends on what kind of person you are. I seem not to be able to just sit down and write, I have to process my ideas in my head for some time first.
Do you get attached to your characters or do you forget about them once the book is done? Because John and Meg stayed with me for a long time after reading the book.
As it turned out, this was just the beginning of a Conservative Party policy drive that reflects an insistence on market based economic solutions which is at odds with their claim to be a Party of the centre.
I don't believe that Piper is an angel now. I don't believe that she is always watching me nor do I believe that I can talk to her. It's not in my realm of theology to think these are true but I do believe even better.
So yeah, my last post was a glimpse into my world as a homeschool teacher to pregnant and parenting teens. Katherine was my very first student and she was a doozy to say the least. I will say that in the end, I over-bonded, got way too close, bought the baby gifts, and was taking home phone calls (this was pre-cell phone days) from her mother, Lois, that always ended with "I love you teacher." Needless to say they made room for me on the couch and I didn't know how to set boundaries. I think about that family, I wonder how many children Katherine has now, and I can calculate how old her first baby would be but it just makes me depressed about my own age. Katherine might well be a grandmother by now if the pattern repeated itself.
STARS
Sorry I haven't posted in a while but it has been a little crazy around here. So I have some news! I was accepted to be an artist at the Art Hive where I will be selling my goodies from hello *there*!
Pictures time!
I have to admit I have not stepped foot in an Ann Taylor store probably since Junior High. I am in Charlotte this week visiting my rents and my mom wanted to stop in today to show me a dress she liked. Boy was I pleasantly surprised. I think they are trying to revamp their image. They now have Kate Hudson as their model who I really like. They had some great neon stuff in the store for way better prices than most boutiques around town. I used to think AT was just for older women but I was proven wrong.
Storage and Fuel
Hi, friends. I hope you are having a great Friday. Ours is wonderful because it's the beginning of Spring Break! We started by doing some spring cleaning. My girls weren't that thrilled, though, but this mama is happy to get some work done, so we can enjoy the rest of the week better.
*Hint: Many kids get confused after 10 so be patient! Always correct your child's mistakes calmly and then move one!
Q: How does ABC address advertising headlines that do not appear in the digital edition?
Brandy
Little did I know, when writing my previous monthly wrap-up, that my leisurely, random reading plans were about to be hijacked by a frenetic, strictly-structured schedule. A few weeks ago, the longlist for the Independent Foreign Fiction Prize was announced, and after I foolishly announced that I was planning to read a good few of the books nominated, I was invited by Stu of Winston's Dad to join the Shadow Panel for the event.
43. Be a better house keeper.
When you realize that this very day can be your sweet someday.
We all saw Arsenal from 2001-2004 become one of the best sides in Europe. Comparing the talent and character of that team is chalk and cheese. So let’s not kid ourselves any further Mr Professor. Merci and Au Revoir.
Well, this is interesting. How did you know that my alternate secret origin story (as opposed to the one where I am constantly at odds with Reed Richards and constructing a giant laser in space) revolves around the world of highly competitive and dangerous, underground break-dancing street gangs. When our gangs clashed it was an all-out no holds barred, anything goes throw down. You bet your sweet ass that I did my fair share of serving in those days. Back then I was known as “Bloody B” and the scourge of west Philadelphia. Needless to say, I won ALL the break dance competitions I was in except for one: the last.
The famous mechanic (quantum mechanic/physicist) Wolfgang Pauli was once asked to review a paper. When he was done, he proclaimed, "That's not right. It's not even wrong!" It may be thoroughly and rigorously prepared. It may be beautifully written and presented. It may be strictly logical within its own context. Nonetheless, it springs from a root which is so essentially incorrect, so far from valid, that it would have to improve immensely to be merely wrong. It's so ridiculous that it's "not even wrong." I would apply this criticism to the modern concept of curriculum.
Title: The Discovery
Bring butter, dark molasses, sugar, and spices in a pot to a single boil and remove from heat. Add flour at once and stir in quickly. Let dough cool down. Then wrap it into cling film and put into the fridge. Let it rest overnight.
—Adolf Hitler, 1931
Supper tonight was sliced gammon with roast potato's, carrots, green beans and clebrese with parsley sauce made from the parsley pot I have in the garden downstairs. Baked bananas and ice cream for dessert.
I Set My Friends On Fire – You Can’t Spell Slaughter Without Laughter – Oct 7
Actor, has appeared in West End, London
Art on Main: Jayne is still waiting to see if we have been accepted for a booth here. Oct 8th Let Jayne or Laurie know if you want to sell some of your creations.
It added: "Offenders will be severely punished."
1 sketches
FaceBook Application
Nani exchanged passes with Giggs from a corner to deliver a cross that Joe Hart could only punch to Michael Carrick, whose volley was blocked by Vincent Kompany. The Belgian’s arm was raised to his chest but referee Andre Marriner was unmoved.
The failure of imagination that divided the Duke monopoly and such farmers as my grandfather seems by now to be taken for granted. James B. Duke controlled remotely the economies of thousands of farm families. A hundred years later, “remote control” is an unquestioned fact, the realization of a technological ideal, and we have remote entertainment and remote war. Statistical knowledge is remote, and it isolates us in our remoteness. It is the stuff itself of unimagined life. We may, as we say, “know” statistical sums, but we cannot imagine them.
In love
In order to increase product salience vendors often use forms of what you might call "oppositional marketing". I guess this works (at least partly) because we're all highly responsive to signifiers of conflict - I'm sure that there are good evolutionary reasons for that. At its simplest, this can be as crass as "knocking copy": "Product B is crap (here's how) - buy Product A!".
There are alot of mistakes people make when it comes to Islam...
Lavinia
For my second attempt, I really wanted to use Amy's gorgeous "like butta" corduroy. IN LOVE with this one! I promise I won't carry my corduroy bag when I'm wearing my corduroy skirt. I am OB-SESSED with her corduroy!
By far, this bar was the nicest and most decorated bar we had been to. What was most interesting was the way the bar was literally split in half. One half was a “luxurious” side- the elegant black and white theme appearing in the cushions, chairs, tables and walls. On the other half was the “grungy” side- the graffitied walls, ammunition war crates used at tables and empty among other unique decorations made this side more the popular and interesting side to sit on. It was not until we were seated and noticed “The Berlin Wall” protruding from one of the walls that we understood the reference. I thought it was very creative.
Amanpour: of course we do
As I looked back in reflection over the day, this moment stood out to me. How kind, I thought, of people to help my son. What a great example of lending a hand, a gentle witness, a dose of TLC. But then it expanded a bit more for me. For some, it seems all we have collected has hit the tile floor and spilled out upon the ground. With arms filled to the brim, we look around a bit helpless wondering what in the world we’re going to do. There are those who will stand back and watch, hoping for the best. There will be those who will scoff at the inability to keep from dropping and spilling our collection…maybe we didn’t hold on tight enough. There will be others yet who will, standing from their perspective, offer advice and direction. But there will be those who will hit their knees beside us and help us pick up our change.
I stayed up until 2 a.m. listening to that cd and it hasn't left my cd player since. I truly believe it is her best work yet. Taylor Swift is quite literally fearless in this album, she sings about all the things she wishes she would have said and that most of us are too afraid to say in everyday life (or at least I happen to be). I full well know that every time I started to date a cute guy, someone I really liked, I had that moment where I imagined this very elaborate future (MINE). Of course I would never dream of saying to him, "my God I just saw our wedding in my head, it was great. Oh and P.S. we are going to have ten adorable super model babies". Or how about when you just meet someone, for the very first time, and you simply can't get them out of your head and it makes you so giddy you dance around in your room (ENCHANTED). Then there's that guy, the one you let go, and at the time you were so sure of your decision, but now that he's gone you can't stop thinking about what you lost (BACK TO DECEMBER). Of course telling him you were wrong would require swallowing your pride and let's say you actually decided to come clean, well he could always slam the door in your face. Wouldn't that be a bundle of joy?
I have used a gorgeous LOTV image teamed with some fab BG papers....
The organizer had planned for a fun activity during the party; decorating onesies. She had iron on fabric and stencils, along with fabric pens, plenty of plain onesies, and an iron - hot and ready to go. We made some cute little outfits for the mommy-to-be to take home.
Blowing through the jasmine in my mind
The writing was fairly good. The conversation and even the narration utilized altogether too much slang and profanity. Listen, I don’t care if that’s how every teenager you meet speaks– I like my books clean of all such elements and grammatically correct as much as possible. There are books where the occasional swear word is permissible, but when it comes up in every conversation, something’s off.
I don't know why this always brings a wave of sadness over me. Is it because the significance of the 26th makes me realize time is getting away from me, and the amount of time since I held you in my arms for the last time. It was the day we said hello and goodbye to you all at once. The day my heart was crushed and overjoyed all at the same time.
Key Statistics
Excellent brew!
Total = $12.50
Mr Campbell offered them a shed to sleep in; he didn’t want them chopping down his trees to build their huts. From that point, hoodlums from Mugabe’s Zanu-PF Party kept turning up. Over the years, everything went. They stole the irrigation pumps and tractors he’d used to turn his 3,000 acres of veld into mango and citrus groves so lush that he had become the leading grower in Zimbabwe, selling his fruit to Marks & Spencer in England. They rustled his cattle, a special Sussex/Mashona herd of small, hardy beasts. They even stole the copper telephone wires on which the bright blue bee-eaters would sit and flash, and set fires round his stone-and-thatch farmhouse which he couldn’t put out, except with the garden hose he used to water his roses.
A lot of the people I follow on Twitter I follow because I'm a fan. Sure, I follow other industry experts and friends, but I also follow a lot of chefs (in my case). People I admire for their culinary skills. Some of my favorites are those I've gotten to "know" through various food competitions like Top Chef, Food Network or even their cookbooks or blogs. Not too long ago I was leaving Atlanta after a great conference with the Georgia Romance Writers. While waiting at the airport I Tweeted that I was leaving ATL and was bummed I didn't have the chance to visit Flip Burger and I included chef and owner Richard Blais (@RichardBlais) in my Tweet. Just a few short hours later @RichardBlais tweeted back "not as bummed as we are."
I have to give up coffee again, I can have it on occasion but not daily. I didn't drink it for a whole year and have just been enjoying it since June, I don't care as long as I get better :)
On the fourth day of Christmas
His first known piece of mail directing a recipient to "please send to..." dates from 1958. The mail art became more systematic with the foundation of the "New York Correspondence School," increasingly using the US mail for his wittily typed and hand lettered cryptic texts and drawings.
All of this is to say that the night before school, I made kissing hand cookies for not just my class, but ALL of our kindergarteners. That means I made 90 cookies. I started at 9:00...I didn't realize what a silly idea this was. The store bought dough is too sticky to roll out easily so I had to make the dough from scratch, then I got ready to roll it out when I realized my rolling pin is missing. Lost from moving last January I suppose. So my impromptu rolling pin was a vodka bottle.
DEPRESSION: A very common symptom caused by an increased rate of vibration. This higher frequency forces any illnesses, viruses, or infections hiding in the body to surface. To discover the root-cause contributing to this state examine your beliefs and decisions that are creating your reality. It is also important to monitor your internal dialogue to learn what you are creating for yourself. Observing and realizing the state you are experiencing is not cause by the present allows it to quickly pass. The herb “St. Johns Wart” eases depression and is anti-viral too.
A lot of people keep asking "so how are you holding up?" like I should be in some state of panic and depression and feeling overwhelmed. Trust me, I get overwhelmed sometimes but the transition has been great. I was made to be a mom to these 3 precious blessings. I feel full and complete. Yeah life needs to be more organized and things more scheduled but thats the life while having littles.
The cases involved zinc phosphide, a “readily available rodenticide that, on contact with stomach acid and water, produces phosphine, a highly toxic gas,” explained a team led by Rebecca Tsai, an epidemic intelligence service officer at the CDC. People who use the rodenticide are typically aiming to rid properties of burrowing rodents such as gophers or moles, and the products’ instructions say that the pellets should be inserted within the animals’ tunnels or burrows.
In my house he does. Let me tell you a little story about my discovery of the Cookie Monster...
With Islam, on the other hand, every single word in the Koran must be believed and acted upon by every Muslim. Every single word came from Allah himself. It is, in effect, Allah speaking to all Muslims. In that strong sense, every Muslim is by definition both a fundamentalist and a literalist. And it is these things alone which utterly distinguish Christians and Christianity from Muslims and Islam.
“Embassytown,” China Miéville (Macmillan UK; Del Rey; Subterranean Press)
The problem, Whittle says, is that those who don’t govern themselves end up creating pressure for a government that strips away those choices. It’s a little more complicated than that, however. Those who want government to dictate choices usually consider people inherently incapable of making those choices on their own — and that’s not a dynamic limited to non-believers, either. It usually comes from a misanthropic view of humanity, the exact opposite of the views of men like Adams and Jefferson, and a belief in the wisdom of “elites” who know better than the individuals what their self-interests are, and not because of an objective inability govern one’s self, but because the “elites” simply dislike the choices others make. It’s that arrogance that creates nanny states.
Miles 7-10: Brutal. We basically run up Main Street and up...and up...and up for 2 1/2 miles. Up until this point, I thought a PR was within reach but by the time I got to the top of that hill into Sundance Square, I knew that my only shot at PRing this race was to PR the last 5k. I saw my family cheering me on right in Sundance with the awesome signs they made and that definitely gave me a boost to try and push the last 5k to a PR finish.
Most of its salient features can be seen right on the outside, where it makes generous use of carbon fiber and also titanium for its construction. The rest of the body is made of rubber, which makes it shock-proof.
But (of course you knew a but was coming) I DO tweet about these queries. Do I do it to be helpful? Well, yes. But 90% of the audience reading my tweets isn’t who should be getting the advice.
The National Transitional Council enacted the law on Wednesday before elections set for June, when Libyans will vote for an assembly to form a permanent government and write a constitution.
I am extremely pleased by Gakken’s selection and combination of my designs and color choices as applied to these little parcels of beauty now available in Japan.
In “Ping Pong”, a match of table tennis is the foundation for another bass-heavy classic. The familiar “clicks” and “clacks” act as percussion in this instant crowd favorite (the place went nuts in Tallahassee when we saw him there recently). “What” featuring Jansten sees the producer reaching out to lesser known cohorts for collaboration. Where some artists rely on features to catapult album sales or interest, Bassnectar uses his partnerships to explore unknown areas and create new sounds. This is apparent with his ongoing teamwork with producer ill.gates.
Paper: Solar White, Ocean Blue Polish by Prism from DiscountCardstock.com
Whenever I’m talking to readers who live near the coast of the US they usually laugh at the idea that a whole village could forget about the ocean and then I ask them to name the Great Lakes. Only about 5% of the readers I talk to (who don’t live near them) can name all five Great Lakes and I use that to prove how easily information is lost. Besides, if you were facing the zombie horde and passing down stories to the next generation, would you remember to say “Oh and there are these lakes really far away and here are their names just in case you need to know.” And even if you did, would that next generation remember them all and also pass them down?
It is the same game all the way up – it is “Turtles” all the way up.
So this time I give you a classic (mostly) 90's instrumental mix. I didn't really get turned onto rap until 95-96. Before that I just listened to whatever my mom listened to (go ahead and laugh... stuff like Ace of the Base lol!) and when I was much younger whatever my dad listened to (REAL music 70's soul) when I was held hostage on fishing trips. I would actually tape videos from Rap City, Yo! MTV Raps, The Box, Video Soul, and whatever the countdown show was at the time. Life sucked pretty bad otherwise. 95 to 98 was just bad! I was in a car accident. Then I fell down the steps and had to have a surgery. They told me I would never walk again... after I started walking again. The music kept me sane.
Here are some potential measurements for you to try.
These included burning coal indoors and paraffin stoves.
It was cold here Saturday, and perhaps I could have made it down the driveway and back up again but when we woke this morning, it was a sheet of solid ice and by mid-morning, I knew I wouldn’t be going anywhere. I busied myself with housekeeping, a little knitting, some reading, and some bird watching out my kitchen window with my trusty camera at my side.
Besides flipping the sweater from front to back, I have been reworking all of the math. This is for two reasons: first, because the Pashmina has a tighter gauge than the specified yarn, and second, because I always have to rework the math in top-down raglans (or any raglan for that matter). This is because I can never, ever get the specified row gauge. My stitches are shorter than most, I guess, because if I am on target with the stitch gauge, I am always off on the row gauge. As an example, if the gauge is 20 stitches and 30 rows, I will invariable hit 20 stitches and 34-36 rows. This can be death to a raglan; thus, a lot of fiddling with the math ensues.
Let's chat about life, love, books, reality TV, weddings, the Kardashians, blogs and everything in-between! If you're in the Chicago area, even better! Let's hang out! Blogger meetup anyone?
“Let’s get married, Puddin’!” Travis said to Summer one evening, as they sat out on the front porch swing eating freshly made strawberry ice cream. “You’ve been out in the sun too long today, Travis. I ain’t getting’ married again. I‘ve had enough husbands and enough children. Besides I don’t know enough about you or your family.” Summer responded. “What do you wanna know?” Travis asked. Summer replied with a question. “Why did you come to live on the Creek without your family?” “My parents just live over yonder in Middleton. You’ll get to meet them at the wedding.” Travis said. “You’re as nutty as those walnuts in that squirrel’s mouth.” Summer said as she pointed at Denny, the old squirrel that lived in the walnut tree in her front yard. “I’m not nutty!” Travis proclaimed. “I’m more sure about you then I have ever been about anything in my whole life.” Summer’s ice cream began to melt as she said yes with a kiss on Travis’ cheek.
For your chance to win, just leave a comment on this post telling me what star sign you are. Leave your comment before 10pm on Friday 20th April, and I'll pick a winner at random on Saturday 21st April.
Paper towels
I said, "Waitress, tonight I know hate.
7. Desert Vista: 10-35 vs. Hamilton
The Color Room Sketch
I almost feel like giving up. To just stop fighting the current, and going with it, instead. Go to university, even though the thought of sitting in a classroom for years makes me feel like running away and joining the circus, or something similarly irresponsible and wonderfully spontaneous. To pretend all my values, all the things I know to be true, don’t exist, and just get the best paying job I can find, regardless of it’s impact on others, the environment, or my own
I know now there are worse deaths than his, and there are worse fates than mine, but still, this wasn’t the way things were supposed to end. We always took care of ourselves, didn’t make stupid or foolish decisions, didn’t act rashly. We were kind to each other, looked out for each other, respected each other. We shared as much as is possible for two people to share. And this is how it ended: between the covers of a 166 page book.
I'll leave you with the thought of me, swaying like a large pink blossom round the Ballroom floor with a nameless young man, watching the slight awkwardness of the royal bride and groom-to-be dancing to the husky sound of Errol Brown and Hot Chocolate singing You Sexy Thing. Live of course.
So let me leave the last word to Donald Westlake on the lead up to Christmas. This paragraph is rather apt as I survey the year because the word ‘family’ should be viewed in the widest possible context -
Checked KOS for reaction to my diary. Only one commenting on my typo in the title. I guess you cannot follow-up. Should I send them to my list???
And then, AND THEN, I saw a flash of zero and started hyperventilating (internally, of course) and I was like: Oh my god, OH MY GOD, I got a 70. Or is that a fifty? No, this isn’t fair. Life isn’t fair. I hate math. Don’t give it to me. I’m gonna die. Throw it, burn, trash, do whatever you want.
We also stopped at the Almond Blossom Cafe to pick up organic produce before getting the rest of our groceries at the market. They catered our wedding (check out the photo of our cake here at the bottom of the page) and we signed up for a lecture by Dr. Craig Sommers, author of The Raw Foods Bible, there next week so I'll be sure to write about that.
Grandma Townsend is very much better today.
Occupation: Deputy Sheriff of Mayberry, North Carolina; later took a detective job in Raleigh. Worked briefly as a dog catcher and vacuum cleaner salesman.
After you've enjoyed the first beach scene a bit,
“Don’t leave us in suspense, GB!” exclaimed George. “Who is the blighter?”
- Por favor
Ben_Random over at RPGMaker.net posted a useful guide to the phrases we use in the RPGMaker community that might be useful for people who are new to amateur gaming. I was going to write something like this myself, but Ben has done a pretty decent job so it seems a waste not to credit his efforts. I have made some edits to the original so, if you wish, you can find the original guide here
900 Philadelphians, a number that has skyrocketed in recent years, easily circumvented the local licensing process by obtaining a mail-order gun permit from Florida, where the rules are less stringent, reports the Philadelphia Inquirer. Pennsylvania and Florida have a reciprocal agreement to respect each other’s gun licenses. Legislation pending in Congress – and endorsed by a majority of House members – would extend the reciprocity nationwide.
Because there was no dead body. Because Christ had risen from the dead. Extraordinary as it is, it is also the best rational explanation. (One place to explore this further is Dr. Peter Kreeft’s Evidence for the Resurrection of Christ.)
“We are struggling to consolidate unity so that everybody thinks as East Timorese instead of thinking, I’m a Mumbai, I’m a Fataluco, etc.,” President José Ramos-Horta told IRIN, referring to two of the country’s ethnic groups. In 2008, Ramos-Horta barely survived an assassination attempt that stemmed, in part, from regional factionalism.
Everything – from atom to galaxy – is rooted in the same universal and all-pervasive reality. And this reality reveals itself in the purposeful, ordered and meaningful processes of nature, as well as in the deepest recesses of the human mind and spirit.
‘Back in 2004, President Bush ran a smear campaign against challenger Sen. John Kerry (D-MA) which undermined his service in Vietnam and questioned Kerry’s ability and determination to protect the United States — just three years removed from the 9/11 attacks — from another terror strike.
I've decided not to read or watch or research folding or washing the flats in any way. I want to walk into this challenge without any information and see if I can get myself through it ... creatively. Hah. Really, I'm doing this because I wouldn't expect anyone without the resources to purchase diapers to have the resources to research how to use flats. I'm not saying they wouldn't, I'm saying I wouldn't expect them to. I've also never really hand washed anything, so this should be very interesting. I plan to wash the flats in my machine with the rest of Turtle-Love's laundry, and put them through the drier as well for the first wash (before the challenge starts). I'm justifying this because while maybe you wouldn't tote dirty diapers to the laundry mat, I see no reason not to take clean ones there. I'm going to put away all my "fun" diapers and the disposables we keep on hand the day before. Come midnight May 23rd, I'll be switching Turtle-Love into a flat and cover, and we are headed to bed.
Now the Authors Guild has weighed in with concerns similar to the AAR's, particularly about publishers' contractual right to enroll titles in the Library. The AG's full statement, which includes suggestions about what to do if your book is included without your approval, appears below.
There were two bikes that fit my requirements -- a comfy seat and foot brakes. The first one was white, and when I took it for a spin around the aisles it felt too flimsy. I wasn't crazy about the white seat either which would get dirty in the shop, and wasn't as cushy as I hoped. Then I saw another one, way, way up on the rack. It looked way cooler. It had fenders, a back thingamajig to put things on, a leather pouch, drink holder and even a bottle opener on the side of the front wheel. Who could ask for anything more? Although I think bottle caps are no longer even being made, but hey let's keep it vintage, shall we?
To add insult to injury, Hanif is now heading the investigation panel raising doubts about the integrity, reliability and credibility of its findings. As a former Inspector-General of Police, Hanif is first and foremost disqualified from serving on the investigation panel due to this conflict of interest as the police is being accused. Secondly, by publicly condemning Bersih, Hanif’s prejudiced bias would also disqualify him to serve on the investigation panel. Finally, by linking Bersih to communism, Hanif is still fighting yesterday’s long-concluded wars, making the outcome of these investigations a foregone conclusion.
Ford: please run on attacking other Americans
And another thing that I wanted to mention that I have found to be incredibly helpful already with this binder, was the addition of a pencil pouch to the back, which holds pens, a calculator and my binder hole puncher!
We've mentioned the Session Beer Project sticker a couple times. It is for sale at CafePress here. It's $3.74 plus postage; less than a buck of that goes to me. I'm not even sure why any of it goes to me; but it's minimal on all the merch there (including the big SBP hoodie I'll be wearing on Session Beer Day).
the art department had chosen two of my photos
We are going to combine two themes for this week. The connection with Oscar is Sylvester Stallone and we are going to coverall six Rocky movies. The best of the bunch naturally comes first. Rocky was shot on a shoe string budget in 28 days, but became a sleeper hit, both with audiences and critics. Rocky went on to win three Oscars, including Best Picture. As far as I am concerned, it is the greatest sports movie of all time.
1 1/2 - 1 3/4 c mediterranean style (very thick) yogurt or,
08. There's A Ship Arriving Too Late To Save A Drowning Witch #
When I really stop to think about it, it is crazy that I have now been married for NINE years. That is a long time. As my husband so astutely put it the other day, I have been married to him for one third of my life. It sounds even more insane when put like that. Yet here we are.
A.B. Jackson is rather well known already, is he not? Forward prize winner or nominee, if I recall, and one of the best Scottish poets. Funny phrase that, "the well known" - I suggest they not use it again, it rings a bit funny.
4 Tbs. white bread crumbs
Many in white society quickly downplay things like nooses in a tree (it’s just a childish prank), use of the word n#$$%# (it’s a term of endearment) by saying that its art or that there was no harm intended. However, harm is done not only to a people, but also to an entire community. This can not be a simple mistake as we all know parties with entertainment take planning especially when it comes to an elite demographic of guests. Maybe they have a different view of what constitutes racism that we do, Hell no. There is no excuse they can come up with for this conduct or portrayal of the black race or black women. As I have stated once before Black women are the most beautiful women in the world. Wake The Hell Up, America is not the only place on the face of the planet where blacks face such racism and racial slurs.
His points at 1. & 2 above should steer agriculture towards growing more plant protein crops and also science to develop meat-substitutes from them. Especially here in Ireland where we are somewhat obsessed with exporting meat and dairy products to China. Yes, of course it is good for our economy but what about the bigger picture. What if feed costs rise too high? What if the price of meat goes so high? Poorer people cannot afford to eat? (this is already happening) What if a deadly virus kills all the animals – yes, I know it is a doomsday scenario, but still we would be rightly in trouble then. We should also be growing and using plant proteins for human consumption not just for animal feed. Surely that makes more sense than trying to grow meat in a petri dish?
Tools required – 6-yard skip, wheelbarrow, shovel.
2010.08.31 Afghanistan Kabul 11 0 Eleven US troops on security patrol are killed in three roadside bombings.
Seamus O’Farrell and younger brother of Irish amateur J P O’Farrell. Conor did not sit on a horse until he was 15. He attended the Racing Academy
The hairdresser visited early, sticking pins in strategic places and making sure hats and hair were perfectly aligned. Bag, gloves (grey short ones for me this time), shoes polished and pristine, makeup applied, don't forget to wee at the last minute because it will be a long day--the girls with pearls (of course we wore pearls!) were ready to go. It was the strangest of feelings, being driven along that sunlit wedding route lined with what seemed like millions of smiling faces, Union Jacks, and those odd square periscopes which stuck up everywhere like small chimneys. We waved frantically (in a most undignified and unregal way) through the car windows of course--what other opportunity would we ever get to feel like queens? And every time we did there were loud cheers from behind the metal barriers. Even the lined out policemen were grinning at us. It was nine o' clock in the morning, and we had two hours to go before lift-off. The smaller West Door of St Paul's was open, and a crowd of assorted top hats and morning suits and uniforms were pouring in, together with a whole rainbow garden of dresses and feathered, sequinned, chiffoned, strawed and silken creations on heads.
The sailors in “Air” are not in the picture; perhaps they’re the Disciples, just visible in the background of “Water”. In the foreground, their wives; beyond, a “slovenly girl” appears to flirt with someone’s prodigal son. There’s a contrast, not visible in the painting, between this open-air intimacy, and the loneliness of these women married to mariners. “Fire” continues the imagery of families and old flames, and seems to take off even further from the picture; while in “Earth”, the cauliflowers smile “superfluously like maiden aunts.” If this suite of poems has an underlying theme, without amounting to a message, it’s something to do with families: what drives them, and the times when that motor stalls.
Immediately upon arriving at Sparks House, tea-goers would find themselves in the warm embrace of the Reverend. After an initial greeting, they would pass Gomes’ study — on the right — and enter the living and dining rooms — on the left — where tea was prepared. There, a designated “tea-pourer” would pour the steaming beverage from a polished silver tureen. Although the weekly event had little structure, the Reverend insisted on including typical Anglophile customs, choosing a different friend each week be the guest of honor and serve his visitors.
What if you could get a comprehensive service, that really gave your book a good chance in the world!
Pre-heat the oven to 180 degrees C. Line a 24-cm cake spring form with greaseproof paper. Separate the eggs in two large bowls. Beat the egg-whites with a pinch of salt until stiff. In the other mixing bowl, beat the egg-yolks with sugar and amaretto. Instead of amaretto, you can use bitter almond aroma (2 ts). Add softened butter (the butter should be soft but not liquid). Add almonds and breadcrumbs and mix until all ingredients are well combined. Fold the egg-whites into the mixture. Pour the dough into the form and bake in the oven middle for 30 minutes.
Here is a small virtual treat from my kitchen. I am aware that birthdays mean cakes but I baked these super yummy cookies for her that I had bookmarked from Nags Blog
The world has had no shortage of people claiming to be god. I’m pretty sure one of them sits but a stone throw away from my cubicle at work and is ready to present a strong case filled with self-aggrandizing ravings; if you are interested, I’ll introduce you to Brian. You can curse me for it later. In my early 20’s, a time farther away than I care to admit, I became aware of Meher Baba, an Indian mystic who died in the late 60’s, who in my limited philosophy, made about the best case I had heard. This probably doesn’t ring a bell, which to me was the seed of doubt. My conception of the almighty is that he or she would make a bigger splash when touching down on our big ball of mud.
3) Add dried tofu,mixed veges,glass noodles,dried bean curd and bring to boil.
So after taking safety instructions, we climbed into the basket (not at all what I thought it would be like) with five snug compartments and readied ourselves for take off.
Next thing I know, I hear "MOMMY! AAAHHHH! WHITE DOGGY! HELP!"
This week, we welcome a new sponsor to Fab'n'Funky Challenges who has a fantastic offer for ALL PARTICIPANTS in this week challenge . . . so let's hear it for . . .
By far the Eagle’s most famous editor was Walt Whitman, though he only served the post a short time (1846-48). He had a falling out with Van Anden over the issue of slavery — Whitman was a supporter of the Wilmot Proviso, which prohibited the extension of slavery to new territories. Seven years after he left the Eagle, Whitman published the first edition of his groundbreaking Leaves of Grass at a printing shop just around the bend on Fulton Street from the Eagle’s offices.
In addition to the usual problem solving processes of composition and value, it's very problematic to paint on a round surface. I'm definitely not yet done with it, but it's an entertaining experience; this is the first canvas I've had that's capable of rolling away.
Sheikh Gilani, you may remember, is the cleric with whom Daniel Pearl had arranged an interview back in January of 2002. Unfortunately, Mr. Pearl was betrayed by his sources, and then abducted and beheaded. Sheikh Gilani was arrested later that month and languishes in Pakistani custody.
That was just stupid booking from the WWE, and that just killed the whole show and Brock’s entire run. What was the point in bringing him in to job him in his first match back. Stupid, stupid, stupid. Someone needs to slap Vince across the face and tell him to quit kissing Cena’s ass, this was the worst thing they’ve done in since messing up the Invasion. I’m going back to the old school tapes, because this was a complete waste of three hours. After over three decades they’ve finally killed what little interest I have in this company, there is no way to save this anymore.
the child becomes a man
As anyone who knows me, or who reads this blog regularly knows, I'm not the world's biggest fan of the 'trade associations', clubs, and their awards. Although I know members who are smashing individuals, I generally find the clubs and awards a bit stuffy, self-congratulatory and insular.
Later in her life cycle, Dren resembles a human crossed with a bird. Throughout, she appears mute, tittering like a Mogwai, though her chirruping coos are undercut by her unblinking intensity and darting. She’s not as sympathetic as the creation in Frankenstein, but she’s unnervingly compelling in her way.
The amazing parts of my new job are the creative freedom, daily excitement, immense responsibility (yes, i like responsibility, it keeps me out of trouble), and public effect.
Bake the bread for 25 minutes until golden brown. Brush with vegan butter.
The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe is, to my mind, the classic child's fantasy story, a fairy tale not only for children, but for those who have outgrown being too old for fairy tales. It never loses its magic.
On watching TV
1. blog more on my personal blog (which is this one) SO I'd be thrilled if you would follow me:0)
Now….who wants to come with us?!
President Obama got a laugh out of a Maryland audience on Thursday when he mocked the Republican Party in a speech, comparing their skepticism of alternative energy to the “Flat Earth Society” in Christopher Columbus’ day and President Rutherford B. Hayes’ apparent dismissal of the telephone. But while Obama thinks the GOP is in need of a science lesson, he may need to bone up on history himself.
Local artists Jay Harris has created an audio experience based on Deptford High Street sounds. He says:
We are all going to get hit by austerity measures eventually - on both federal and state levels in most cases, and that has to include our heretofore untouchable union members. To paraphrase President Obama, "they are our neighbors, they are our friends" - so maybe they should chip in and help shoulder the burden instead of hold us hostage, dontcha think? You know, as neighbors and friends? Obama says that this is an attack on the unions. You bet! Public sector unions have become too powerful and too expensive. Other states are watching this closely to see if they, too, can bust the unions and save themselves. Bottom line, unions should not have the ability to shut down a government and hold it hostage until their demands are met. That is what the mess in Wisconsin really boils down to.
A second purpose, according to Catherine B Shannon, Professor Emerita of History at Westfield State University and the first woman president of the society, serving in 1990 and 1991, was to “cultivate a spirit of unity and harmony among all resident Irishmen and their descendants in the Massachusetts colony”.
I think my parsley is probably the easiest, it seems nothing can kill this stuff!
“Bus stop!” the bus conductor (driver’s mate) blurted out. I heaved a sigh of relief because the drive to Kaneshie had been longer than usual and it was no less on a day when I was so late, just two days after resolving to go to work early (do resolutions really work? If it does for you, please help me out). But like the little boy in the Camel soap advert, “it’s not my fault!’ After months of hot days, the rains decided to come at dawn and oh yeah, I just forgot it was a week day and pulled the blanket over my head with the hope of sleeping for 30minutes which lasted for 2 hours. You can imagine my frustration when I woke up and realized I was running late. I knew I could not leave the house without having a time of fellowship with my Father (especially today, when one would need supernatural direction at all cost).
Oh! I forgot to mention. This was the first time that I've used Square to accept credit cards. I used it on my iPad. *LOVE* this option!! I think that I only had two non-Square purchases...that "Yes, I can take cards" made all the difference in the world I think.
As soon as I packed up my office on the 40th floor of One Shell Square and moved out to the suburbs, super-awesome things started happening downtown. Many things were in the works long before I made the switch, but seeing (and - occasionally - experiencing) these incredible changes makes me miss being in the CBD.
You guys know that I am OBSESSED with awesome frames and buy them any time I see one. I have accumulated quite the collection so I hung the board and batten so that I could show them off. Its like a mixture of a gallery wall and specimen art of awesomeness.
Subject: FW: Dear Jeff
The real crowd were at the Merlion and Beach stops. Lots of people, tourists for the most part, were gathered there to take pictures of the colorful display of flowers – Sentosa Flowers 2011, an annual event.
Chris Head
Have you been to Marianne Walker's blog? She has some great info on her left side bar, along with some links to specific posts, that will really help you understand blending families. I think it is very important to understand the numbering system on the markers and how they are dividing into blending families. The info there was invaluable to me in choosing my colors. You can find information specific to blending families on this post by Marianne. Also, be sure to check out the blog links on her right sidebar to the Copic Certification Instructors. They are the most amazing colorists and have so much to share!
Chef Rock Harper (@rockthecook from Virginia)
Kamilla Sztyber (FAC Chair) at facartists@gmail.com
Residents of a small town inTexashave filed a petition to gain the depositions of a liquor store. This particular store may have sold alcohol illegally to minors; minors that later died in a drunk driving accident. On September 18, 2011, three minors were killed in this car accident. The driver of the car had surpassed the legal blood alcohol limit.
1.-Marked decrease in CD 57 in NK
Lots of teary moments that week, often over the oddest of photos, of all the many horrific ones that were hitting the Internet out of Nashville and Middle Tennessee. Lots of times just sitting there gaping, open-mouthed.
I might not feel on top of it all, I might be keenly aware of all the ways I can do better, I might wish I could do more, I might feel like I’ve failed when things are left undone, but this weekend I’m feeling proud anyway. Watching my baby in those waters was pure bliss and whatever it took was worth it. The experiences she has already had and the ones I continue to plan are a gift of knowledge and understanding, and a sense of place that may one day radiate from the mirror in her gaze. This gift is important to me, to the earth, to a next generation and one day I hope it will be important to Zi.
34 “Do not suppose that I have come to bring peace to the earth. I did not come to bring peace, but a sword. 35 For I have come to turn
There is a video camera in the room and a speaker.
patience is a virtue i’ve only begun to appreciate:
1-Border Stamp (It also coordinates With the Vintage Winter Paper Pad)
The other guy said he had been through an audit and was overly cautious. I’ve probably been involved (as a CPA, CFO, or wherever) in about 30 or 40 audits. You’re best scenario is when you take all the deductions you are allowed. No more, no less. It makes you look really accurate; it gives them a level of comfort, and keeps them from wandering over into other places you might not want them and asking a gazillion questions.
she was slow as a creeping ice floe,
2cans Coconut milk (one for soup one for rice)
The clandestine world of intelligence is not necessarily dominated exclusively by satanic forces. Various forces - good and evil and those in-between, are at work in this cloak-and-dagger business. The nature of this business therefore makes it near impossible for a layman to determine who are the good guys and who are the bad. Another fact to take cognizance of is that the superpowers have always regarded South Africa as one of their most important ‘backyards’ – a testing ground for future intelligence activates - so to speak!
hospital.
"Why Miss, are you a FUCKING LESBIAN?"
One panel of the Sixth Circuit can’t overrule another, Gilbert explained, citing Salmi v. Sec’y of Health & Human Servs., 774 F.2d 685 (6th Cir. 1985), and 6th Cir. R. 206(c).
Incorporating the ideas from our membership survey last summer, ideas and feedback from committee and board members and staff, the Website Task Force has been dedicated to launching our new website in April – and here it is!
Halfway through the Interior Design course I said I was in the wrong program because I don’t want to encourage “trends” and other behaviour that consumes earths resources, I’d rather reuse, redo and recycle. Hence, I only ever used my design course for what it was with friends and family.
Connecticut is closing down their schools until a cure is put in place, but will soon be opening them back up again for financial reasons. The State has already lost thousands of dollars, so they created a law banning teachers from assigning homework. If they do break the law, they will be assigned lunch duty for a year. Experts believe that if teachers stop assigning homework, then the disease will be cured! -By my friend, 12 years old.
NASA Warns of Warming Oceans
The star fort was developed during the age of gunpowder. The ring-shaped fortification of the Medieval era can no longer effectively defend the city. It is particularly developed in the Italian peninsula against French invasion.
As for the reusable coffee mug process, it’s running pretty smoothly. I did almost forget my mug the other morning, but quickly remembered as I was heading out the door. I have found 1 place so far that gives a discount for using it and that is The Beanery on Monroe street. It’s very close to class! I have also bought some tea from the store because I have been drinking more tea than coffee lately. It hasn’t seemed to create many more dishes for me either.
They sat in the dark kitchen eating crackers and dry cereal. This was it. This was what life was going to be. Scrounging in a darkened world.
Traditional Indigenous Worldview
Ebook editions are at the permanently discounted price of £6.96 (£5.80 plus VAT) and, of course, have no delivery costs.
Get out of freakin' town, right? lol!
Edward G. Brown (Professor at the University of Cambridge):
So…I’m talking about it now.
Every morning the sunlight resets the cycle, stimulating the leading chemicals and thus compensating for the difference between the 24-hour day and the 25-hour innate rhythm.
I think one of the reasons I treasure the efforts which fall short is because I know only to well just how fast they will be a distant memory. In the blink of an eye he'll be asking to watch Phineas and Ferb with Isabelle when we get to the house. And I can't ever bring myself to regret the change, because watching each of these precious kids grow is such a joy.
So for now the plan is to recheck my blood levels in three months, and if they are good then I can wait until the spring for my next scan. I'll have an ultrasound as well as a radioactive iodine scan (yuck!). I'll have to have those frequently because of the high rate of recurrence with this type of cancer. But in the meantime, I've got three more months of playtime before worrying about the next test!
Well, here i go…Tonight i’ll just post the Prologue and then if all goes well i’ll post a page or two of my book (available for sale at Amazon.com by Mel Lynn, or CreateSpace.com by same name)…
At least appearing to love
Thank you, that is all
“You know I have been an unabashed, unapologetic advocate for vaccinations. They are safe. They work,” says Snyderman.
Local community members arrived with placards reading "Hey boere stop killing our farm workers and stop raping our black women"; "Boerevolk is in heaven"; "Land for whites is a dream that should not happen"; and "The ANC is not responsible for Terre'Blanche's death".
"Sure," said Mike. He squinted at the phone. "You just have to push something."
“Do you know what’s really a gateway sexual activity? Having genitals,” says Tina the Lesbian. “Either seal up your cooch or lop off your twig and berries because as long as you have those, the gate’s always open.”
As time went on, a more realistic account of the power of advertising arose. People weren't all docile idiots; they didn't piss their money away on any piece of crap the marketing industry threw at them; advertising needed to have some thinking behind it to be effective.
At the cemetery Staniero comes to see him to tell him about the killings in town. Francesco is a suspect but they have already a man who confessed to the killings at the hospital after trying to kill himself. Francesco is not happy that someone stole his crimes and goes to the hospital. He discovers it is his friend Franco from the council. Francesco shoots a nun a doctor and a nurse dead while talking to his friend. When he leaves the hospital is in chaos because there is a madman killing people. He meets Staniero who sees him with a gun but still fails to make the connection between Francesco and the killings.
Later (if you want) you’ll tell all about the house, the street, the neighbors and maybe even the dog’s make and model, but for now a couple of sentences like that are all you need.
But as yet they have struggled, and continue to struggle to make the journey from my head to my fingers. So for now, the ramblings, the noises of the past, the sound-track to my life, are just not making the cut! The twitches are there in my brain, I can hear the sparks at times, but the electric connections so essentially vital to jump-start those tales into life are just not making contact.
Reason, not irrationality, should be the guide by which we exercise our judgement. Evidence, not rhetoric, should be the gauge by which we measure the veracity of a claim. Logic, not sensation, should be the framework by which we craft an argument; and principled position, not political correctness, should be the rationale by which we arrive at a position. If those are the rules by which we wish our public debate to conducted, then they are the standard by which we should measure any transgression, certainly any complaint.
Quite a few smarter people already beat me to the main point: sending U.S. Special Operations forces to arrest Kony is a bad idea, “off base,” “a recipe for disaster,” “an October Fools’ Day joke,” “the worst idea on the internet today.”
Despite the photo at the top of this post, INK has nothing to do with butterflies (but certainly started producing that fluttery feeling in my stomach as soon as I saw the ARCs).
* abuses of patent rights and the vexed issue of patents and monopolies;
Meanwhile, I began with washing the dishes (as an excuse to listen to MORE Storm of Swords), moved on to the window sill, the window, the curtain, the frame, the walls, the crown molding, the cupboards, the floor, the moving of furniture... I had no idea the impact of wiping the front of one's refrigerator - it looks so prettyful!!
No word, yet, on whether Fox has decided that President Clinton, also in attendance, is similarly not “quite as bad as we thought.”
Hi everyone, hope you're all well and not too soggy! I thought we'd turned a corner with the weather yesterday as it was blue sky and sunshine all day. It's been one of those days at work today (always seems to be a Tuesday!) so a quick post as a relaxing bubble bath is needed!
Start them young, says DPM : Muhyiddin launches interfaith programme, says respect for religions must begin in schools – by Hamzah Nazari – Wednesday, February 22, 2012 – 12:35
- Adjustable,removable shoulder strap
I can't tell you what that did for me as a mom, to know that she was so happy and content in someone elses care. It showed me that she was in an enviroment where she was growing and adjusting and that I didn't need to worry about her well being. She was comfortable. Everyday learning, exploring new things, and being shown the love of Jesus through her teachers.
Luke 10:34 So he went to him and bandaged his wounds, pouring on oil and wine, he set him on his own animal, brought him to an inn, and took care of him.
The band, which has been compared to alt-legends such as Blonde Redhead and At the Drive In, is currently plotting further steps towards world domination and plan to tour the world extensively.
Ever wonder what your baby is thinking? Or why your baby is crying?
Suite no.2, op.108
14. Sweetest Dream
Do you see the little red handle hanging off the side of the bubble bum in the picture above? That's where the seat belt goes through. The little handle hold the seat belt onto the lap of the child and away from the belly and soft parts. It inflates very quick and deflates just as quick. It's an awesome product.
Many thanks to Working Harbor Committee and all their volunteers and sponsors as well as to the towing companies and their crews for making this event possible, even a week after Irene whirled through here. Here’s my favorite action shot from today, Quantico Creek neck and neck with Maurania III as FDNY Three Forty Three misted them. I’m not sure what the results of the race were, but my bias says everyone who participated or spectated–even before hurrying to baseball, tennis, picnicking, or what have you– won.
The conversation Elizabeth David recorded took place in 1951, three years after de Beistegui bought the house from a Labia widow, and only six years after the end of the Second World War - a war that had laid waste to Europe, the East, and to unimaginably vast numbers of people, in the Shoa, on battlefields and at sea, and which rewrote the manuals on Fascism for succeeding generations. Undoubtedly, in those early years of reparation and repair, an ostentatious event such as the Villa Labia ball could be viewed as a rich foreigner's attempt to buy his way into an old and hermetic society - much in the same way as did the Labia family centuries before - and, given the rawness of the early post-war years, perceived as spitting in the face of the still-suffering populations of Europe. That is how, I think, the young man in Elizabeth David's tale saw the situation. If I have taken his measure correctly, the young man, the anti-hero, saw the situation for what it was.
In this workshop you will learn:
The Chinese cheerleaders were a mixed blessing for some. The captain of Yemen’s volleyball team complained that his players had been put off their game by the presence of these fragrant lotus blossoms.
What do you get?
Saturday night we went out with friends to a local sports bar and watched the Lions/Saints game.. the poor Lions.. maybe next year!!
When we get to the car, I pull the handle to our beast of a car.
It's hard to believe that Mother's day is JUST around the corner! It still feels like we just packed up the Christmas stuff!
Over the years of its servitude as an American puppet, the Pakistan government has brought this on itself. Pakistanis let the US purchase the Pakistan government, train and equip its military, and establish CIA interface with Pakistani intelligence. A government so dependent on Washington could say little when Washington began violating its sovereignty, sending in drones and special forces teams to kill alleged Al Qaeda, but usually women, children, and farmers. Unable to subdue after a decade a small number of Taliban fighters in Afghanistan, Washington has placed the blame for its military failure on Pakistan, just as Washington blamed the long drawn-out war on the Iraqi people on Iran’s alleged support for the Iraqi resistance to American occupation.
After the past 8 months and what has gone on with this case I should have expected nothing less from the Norwegian State which is a shame because the people of Norway seem like nice people and I have done my very utmost to help explain this and further the investigation which is exactly what I said I would do.
I hate this for a number of reasons, firstly I don't see the 'christmas spirit' in treating your friends and family like personal shoppers. Secondly, I can buy these things myself. If I haven't it's usually for a good reason. So I will either have to wait an extra couple of months for something I really want, or receive something that I kind of wanted, but not enough to actually buy it.
Hence my award.
Accessories: American Crafts felt Thickers, Kaisercraft mini letter stickers, Wilton doily, buttons, twine, Spellbinder's Nestabilities, Dienamics die from MFT (scallops and die on "photoshoot" photo), American Crafts (6 - 4" x 6") page protectors
I've also made a version with pork floss at home, worked out just as well.
ce truly helpful. Besides it will help you honor them and them to know that you respect them. I also asked some of my friends who are young in the ministry. I knew that the level of experience wasn’t there but the fact that they were praying for me was encouraging.
“Exactly!....No, wait…. That’s different!”
On other occasions, she and her husband used my house as a romantic getaway. I was always glad it served that purpose for someone, mine being a rather singular life.
Itching leads most people instinctively to scratch the affected area. Different people can tolerate different amounts of itching, and anyone’s threshold of tolerance can be changed due to stress, emotions, and other factors.
If nothing else, going to the Y six days a week and twice Monday and Tuesday reminds me “I ain’t here for a long time; I’m here for a good time.”
Sweet's version of "Shadows Of The Night" (subtle, but telling lyric difference - in Sweet's version, she and her lover are running "thru the shadows of the night", not "with" them as in Benatar's version) is nowhere near as bombastic and overblown as Benatar's, and maybe that's why it didn't click with Top 40. It is, however, a bit more honest and heart-rending than Pat's, and definitely stands on its own merits. The rest of the album is a keeper, too.
“We gonna climb this mother ‘ucker,” he tells me. I tell him he left out the ‘f’ in fucker, but he’s already climbing up the wooden stilts. He peers his head down at me. “Climb! Seriously, if you’re not going to participate in myArizonahoodlum activities, I’m gonna spit a rufee into the next shot you take and butt rape you. Like hardcore butt rape you. Like porno muscled men with moustaches and a rack of abs butt rape you. It’ll hurt you like child birth.”
This seems unnecessarily cruel to me. Why would a Creator try to harm Their creation like this, the only, single being out of all of His/Their creation with the intelligence to be curious about it? Especially in light of an omniscient God, who would have known what would happen.
Dambisa Moyo from Zambia has said much the same. A best selling author and one of Time Magazine's "100 Most Influential People in the World", Moyo says it's time to stop focusing on the old story because Africans are ready for change. Don't focus so much on the negative. There is a vibrant young population coming up who are eager to participate in the global economy & will do what it takes so their countries can sustain itself.
Anyway, yesterday (Easter Monday) I noticed my temperature rising to the highest it's been for a while - taking my temperature at regular intervals in the day is second nature to me now - and I hit 37.52 around 18:30.
Leggings: Grunge Cupcake Leggings-Pink- Orsini (Kawaii Fair Item)
Unfortunately, there were also some disasters:
PS. I secretly ran one of these on a pic of Nick, and I was less than pleased with the results.
The article is larded from beginning to end with evidence of Bloom's distaste, which makes it a consistently unsympathetic, negative, and in places even gratuitously derogatory portrayal of White Iowans.
yoginām—of all yogīs; api—also; sarveṣām—all types of; mat-gatena—abiding in Me; antaḥ-ātmanā—always thinking of Me within; śraddhāvān—in full faith; bhajate—renders transcendental loving service; yaḥ—one who; mām—Me (the Supreme Lord); saḥ—he; me—Mine; yuktatamaḥ—the greatest yogī; mataḥ—is considered.
So far we have (and I use the term WE very loosely here)
Went skipping back
I can’t believe it's March already, at this rate I’ll blink and it will be Christmas again. I’m actually happy that this month came so fast because on the 21st Romance Around the Corner will be celebrating its first year anniversary. The blog went live on the 9th but the 21st was the day we posted our first review, so that’s the day it counts. We need to plan something special to do that day, but to be honest, just the fact that you’re reading us and we continue to post reviews is special enough for us. Also, my birthday is March 28th and the blog has been the best present I’ve ever given to myself (although I once ate two whole racks of BBQ ribs which comes a close second, and as the most delicious present I’ve ever eaten, followed but the worse birthday indigestion that shall not be named).
10 Tips For Toenail Fungus Prevention and Removal
I liked the friendship between these four friends and how the four men are connected through the women. They create their own friendship which was sweet to read.
Been in a bit of a funk of late – thankfully not for lack of good people around me. There’s just this sort of self-starting internal glumness that settles in now and then, accompanied by a bit of writer’s block (if I may be so bold as to call myself a “writer” for hell’s sake) and no matter whom you’re around or where you go, the pervasive gloominess hangs on for some reason.
In August 2007, I checked two duty free shops in Terminal 1, South wing. The selection was exactly the same in both. They had 700ml bottles of 12 and 18 year old Yamazaki single malts at very reasonable prices. The 12 was at 4,500 yen compared to 7,119 yen in normal supermarkets. The 18 was 15,000 yen not 21,000 yen. The Yamazaki 12 was also available in a 180 ml bottle for 1,100 yen.
3. My pictures of children are of my children at commercial places like Disney World‘s Epcot and not an ethnic and interesting child in Vietnam or some other culturally rich part of the world. I live in a subdivision. When we do go on vacation it is to places that don’t require a 22 hour plane ride and 9 vaccinations for each child.
and i'm going to show you how she looks because, though i take pride in my work, i feel that our relationship is strong enough to endure the reveal of... ugly.
When you have the facts on your side, argue the facts. When you have the law on your side, argue the law. When you have neither, holler and pound the table.
Anyway, ignoring my feelings about the film technique, it raises a lot of questions that I find myself discussing often. In the film we hear from both sides of the argument. The "violence poisons our mind and desensitizes us" side, and the "Free speech" counter-point. This is an issue that rears its ugly head with each generation scapegoating art as the devil. In the early 20th century, the devil was jazz, in the 50's it was Elvis, in the 80's it was slasher films, and now it's video game violence (along with cable television). I have always argued that it was Disney all along...
collage: Alive by KAO
The tower was designed by the Owen Luder Partnership on behalf of Whickham Council who at the time controlled the Dunston area of Gateshead. The original brief was to design three high-rise blocks of at least 22 storeys, but due to adverse ground conditions on site, the decision was made to build one tower, with the rest of the properties being low-rise blocks of 2 to 5 storeys. Despite the architect's advice against construction of a high-rise building on the site, the council were strongly in favour. Following many consultations and explanatory models of the foundations with specialists, construction of the foundation began in February 1968, and the tower was completed in March 1971.
staph and E-coli*. Compared to other method's we
Enough milk to mix very stiffly.
“The Lord reigns, he is robed in majesty;
I watched his dance many times through. Right off the bat, I was impressed by his leg lines and his stretch across the body. He is by far the most advanced of all the boys out there. If the dancing isn’t enough, just listen to the judges’ comments!
﻿﻿﻿﻿The main reason I decided to run for the Wilber Czech Queen title was because I'd wanted to be the Wilber Queen since I was little! I can remember going to the Czech Days parades (and participating in them) since before I was even born. Mom was 8 months prego marching through the parade with me in her big round tummy, I guess even back then the Czech music just made me a happy little camper. :) I was also the Wilber Czech Princess back in 1999-2000 so I had a little experience traveling and I had a great time with it! I had Chrissy Keller as my queen so it was a fun time making memories with the Kellers! Another reason I wanted to run was because I felt as an active community member I wanted to do my part to represent Wilber and spread the knowledge not only of my heritage, but of my community and what we do throughout the year to promote our Czech heritage.
For those in Brussels have decreed
The Blue Men are particular favourites of mine, having written about them in my own mythical journey round the tales of Britain, Coll the Storyteller's Tales of Enchantment. This is how I described them:
Anyway, that was my Topical Tuesday blog which I wrote because I absolutely hated the one I wrote last Sunday and have now deleted it. I don't normally do that but it was awful and not the return to blogging I wanted it to be. I might reuse the title I gave it though, there was some nice alliteration going on in there.
“Freedom of the press in Britain is freedom to print such of the proprietor’s prejudices as the advertiser’s won’t object to.” – Helen Swaffer
It was extremely difficult on my mind to hit him. I have never hit anyone in my life. I don't even spank my kids. I know I can't hurt him. That isn't the issue. It is the mental block of hitting. This is why I need to train. I literally forced myself not to freeze. It was a conscious effort and it was a tough one.
or else you will die a martyr and be blessed
-No my dear Lady..I come here for the silence....
Cinco de Mayo is Saturday. We’ve got wild plans. I’m running one of those crazy mud runs in the morning. The kind where you subject yourself to militant type challenges and recover by running as fast as you can to the next barbaric task. It sounded way more appealing 6 months ago. Jon’s probably doing this again.
So give up now; fulfil each whim; come with me to Hell’s dark night.’
"The drop in birth rates translates to over 108 million less births a year,” continued Myers. “Psychologically, that’ll have devastating effects on societies. In a matter of five years, the set of people below 14 years of age will drop by almost 40% - over 700 million people – nearly twice the population of the United States. The proportion aged 65 years and above will nearly double. In short, this will be the biggest crisis we’ve ever faced. As for the cause, we don’t know anything for sure, but there’s no evidence to show it’s a disease."
Q: Though the emotional abuse that Joy is dealing with was a really personal part of the story for me, I was also really taken by the tales of these kids on the Seattle streets. I have a friend who worked for a Seattle homeless organization for years (Real Change) and I've of course seen the number of homeless you have there (and that most big cities, Chicago included, have). It's something that we are almost immune to. We become used to seeing homeless people and too often don't pause and think about their situations. You obviously did. Can you tell me what kind of research you did to write as realistically as you have about homeless teenagers?
TCC construction continues apace, debts unpaid, owls unalive, everybody unhappy.
Birdie picture update as of a few minutes ago, 10pm Tucson time. D took the picture, he thought you all should have a daily update. Ladybird is spending more time out of the nesting box now. The big one seems to keep the others warm for her. D is calling that Huey Jr aka Herbie. I'm really quite thrilled as it looks like they are going to make it. Unlike those canaries when I was five.
(iv) The real legal identity of the witness must be disclosed to the accused prior to the reception of the witness’s evidence and the accused be permitted to identify the witness visually and auditorily.
When a litigant says, “It isn’t about money, it’s about principle,” it’s always about money. And when a black says, “It isn’t about race, it’s about justice,” it’s always about race. Most blacks have no concept of justice; they just have a concept of racist black prerogative.
The maximum sentence for the top count of the current charges is a 5-year prison sentence for invasion of privacy for each of them.
If Latino immigration into the United States continues, it would raise the fertility rate from its present 1.6 children per family to 2.11, which historical studies have shown is just barely sufficient to maintain a culture for 25 years or more. Without them, the United States and Canada could well become yet other Islamic nations not long after Europe.
Bersih 3.0 will be held at the historic Dataran Merdeka and will go on from 2pm to 4pm.
1501 Vine Street
This philosophy — beautifully written as it is — offers little solace to the questing heart. In his Noble Prize acceptance speech, however, Faulkner suggests that we are not condemned to a fate of despair, that we may, indeed, find lasting meaning in our lives. Listen!
And greet the man of means who sired them;
Matilda is just plain painful to watch. Brain-numbing. Deadening. Stultifying. Even Elliott Gould - a man who had the temerity to star (with Donald Sutherland) in a movie called S*P*Y*S - can be seen visibly struggling every moment to not break free and run off-screen; run somewhere far away where there are no cutesy-poo stereotypes, no horrific kangaroo masks, no over-simplified good vs. bad stories and no misplaced product placement. And I can't say I blame him.
Patrice was black. I am white. I grew up at a time – the 1960s and 1970s – and in a place – segregated New York – where I did not have a chance to befriend many black people. As a matter of fact, I did not know many white Christians either. Nearly everyone in my hometown of Great Neck were white Jews.
where we never see
Aren’t you glad that you live in a culture where the pastor of a church feels comfortable sharing the intimate details of his sex life with the world! I know I am!!
The pain is going to have to be ratcheted up a few more notches yet, before they start seriously squealing and taking note of what is happening around them – and enquiring into why we are where we are.
October 2010
In the good, in the bad, and in the magical moments of life.
Aristotle believed that everything had a telos–its aim, purpose, or maximum potential. Achieving this purpose led to arete or excellence. The telos of man was eudaimonia which is happiness or flourishing–a life lived to its utmost.
Polka Dot Embossing Folder
McLaren’s first win at Barcelona’s Circuit de Catalunya. Mika Hakkinen is utterly dominant: he’s fastest in every practice session and starts from pole position. With his McLaren team-mate David Coulthard following him home, the result is McLaren’s third 1-2 in four races.
And then one day, the rain stopped falling and an answer dawned. It may not have been the one I was looking for, but no one could deny that there dwelt a renewal of hope.
My foot is still constantly aching, with occasional stabs of pain. Last week, I walked every single day, at least 20-30 minutes, and had a ton of pain in the evenings. So this week, I'm trying a new strategy. Last night, we ended up walking 50 minutes total (did about 2 miles), and the pain while walking was no worse than having done just 20 minutes at the time (the pain over night and this morning though? Yowza.). SO...I'm going to try completely resting it today (will do my trainer workout tonite which keeps me off my foot for the most part), and then tomorrow do another 2 or so miles, as far as I feel I can go. I'm hoping that this might strengthen it a bit more. Or it could be a huge fail. Ya never know until you try. I was really losing motivation for walking, so it feels good to have some sort of "plan", if nothing else.
In reviewing the evidence of forensic pathologist Dr Hughvon Des Vignes who performed the autopsy on the body, the judge said the child weighed 30 pounds, was underdeveloped and undernourished. He told the jury that given her size they would have to determine whether the accused could have strung her up by tying a cloth to her hair and affixing her to a ledge.
Insert today. We were all buggin’ from a sibling’s birthday. Sabotage was on the Loose….
One rather disappointing anomaly in what is quite a traditional pub is the sighting and volume of the TV. It is right next to the bar, stood at which with a trailer for terrifyingly important sport on, neither myself or the person serving could hear each other.
While I’m enjoying my summer, I’m looking forward (just a little bit) to the school routine again. There’s plenty to look forward to this year in my book; I will have a 10th grader, a 6th grader, and a 4th grader. It’s hard to believe we’ll be starting our 7th year at home. Some days I feel like a veteran homeschooler, and some days I feel like I am just starting out. I still have so much to learn. Homeschooling is an ever-changing thing, and I hope our family continues to grow with it as well as we have these past several years. I love being with my kids every day, and the close relationship our family has thanks to our decision to homeschool. Looking back, I wouldn't have done it any other way!
Don't worry, I learned a few things from this encounter.
I'm just putting that on record. Hubris?
run. Time on our new Wii game machine has been
My parents divorced when I was four. I lived mostly with my mother, a woman who worked hard to carve out a life for us that provided me with opportunity–good schools, church with my grandmother and a safe neighborhood. She did not collect alimony, and though there was a monthly check for child support, the brunt of rent, food, and essentials were hers to bear. A divorced woman in the late 1950′s and early 1960′s was not considered a badge of virtue. It was difficult for my mother to make friends, let alone create income. I remember that she had a job at a large sporting goods store, doing the job of collecting unpaid debts. Evidently she was good at what she did, and had worked there for several years, when the owners of the store hired a young man to be her assistant. My mother was thrilled to have the extra help until one day during a conversation it was revealed that the young man was making quite a bit more money than my mother was. It was her department. She had been there the longest. She had proved herself and yet. . .
8:00 - 6 oz jar of fruit, toast
And winds and shadows fall towards the West:
your wishes a reality.” Mattie turned the card over as if to find Jack’s professional punch line typed neatly in bold Helvetica across the blank face, half expecting to see, “Just Kidding!” or “I’m full of shit” but instead of the obvious blank back of a card followed Jacks favorite professional quotable quips, “I Give Two Beans!” Jack proudly pointed at the slogan and poked his middle finger at type face admitting, “But the truth is I'm only able to
2. Click "Request Custom Item" in the toolbar on the right hand side of the page.
Bring on the beefcake!
Out of a germinal golden radiance spread
Bronze: Beer Gone Good, Terrapin Beer Co., Athens, GA
Once again, there are both open and closed coppers. Why did they have both types? Were the open ones for Pale Ale, as we've seen in other breweries? I can only wildly speculate. Maybe you can help me about their design. It sounds to me as if each copper has its own furnace, placed underneath it. Are these direct-fired coppers? I think they probably are. The alternative would be to use a steam coil, which is how they were heating water in the hot liquor tanks. This is one of the first breweries I've come across in Scotland that does appear to use direct-fired coppers.
"But the Dewan Rakyat did not take it up within three months and it lapsed," he said.
Knitting is going well, I think I am FINALLY going to be getting back to my knitting group this Friday. I haven't been there in FOREVER! I'm still working on my item for the Halloween vamp swap I'm doing on Ravelry, when I'm finished I will post a pic of it and everything I got for my partner. I hope she likes everything!
"If the Venus Table cannot be used to prove the FMT as Lounsbury suggests, its acceptance depends on the reliability of the corroborating data," he said. That historical data, he said, is less reliable than the Table itself, causing the argument for the GMT constant to fall "like a stack of cards."
“What if that light doesn’t show up?” asked Chris.
Oddly enough, I felt Matt to be too nonchalant. Yes, he couldn't direct his anger at his dying wife but show me that he roughed up a punching bag or something. I would have sent my two jiu jitsu brothers to pay this lover a visit! Matt was also passive with his daughters, like allowing them to be vulgar in his presence. But there was a couple great supporting characters, Sid and the nanny, that brought in some spice and perspective. Overall, I didn't like Matt's initial ignorance but I did like his renewed passion for life and commitment to be there for the family ..including respecting his heritage and leaving a proper legacy.
In his honor we named it “the reading room.”
So when it feels like you are just miring down in the muck of figuring out the best way to do things, celebrate that. Celebrate the fact that your are honing your craft. Celebrate the disasters and the failures. They are what make you successful. I have made many mistakes along the way and continue to make them. But I don’t freak out about them nearly as much any more. I use them to learn. I celebrate them more. And after 10 years, some pretty amazing things are happening. I was just voted one of the Top 25 Newsmakers for 2011 by Engineering News Record, a national magazine for the construction industry. People are starting to call me now. It was always referral based, but I had to push that much more. Now people are calling me to speak, to teach, to help with them their employees. It’s very rewarding. But I don’t think I would be at this point if I had not failed and had problems.
As all ad contras know, the best way for a loudmouth meatball to grab some cheap headlines is to declare something "dead." The more absurd the claim, the better.
when that is done
1995, Oasis scored their first UK No.1 single when ‘Some Might Say’ went to the top of the UK charts.
I think it is simple enough to say, concerning the grace you are willing to demonstrate towards others, this: How much grace has been shown you? And lest we answer too quickly let us bear in mind that the standard of grace we demonstrate is God’s grace to us. Howard Marshall wrote, “The mercy of God supplies both a pattern for his children to follow and a standard of comparison for them to attain.” So when God Himself is the standard of comparison and the pattern for us to follow, I have to ask: Should there be anyone outside the scope of our grace?
i have long been obsessed with crosses. something so simple yet beautiful. i am very picky about cross jewelry though. so picky that i dont own any cross pieces because i am very particular. these asos stacking rings are nice to look at but i am afraid of the quality being horrible since the price is so cheap ($14). i recently made a cross ring purchase, but alas i shan't tell until it arrives :)
Beeld is in possession of the statements and has seen the report to Mkhwanazi.
I don’t agree. It’s just not that simple. Sometimes the correct response is to hold fast and stay true; other times it is to apologize and say you’re sorry and learn from your mistakes. We’re all fallible; even warriors.
Solar electricity can be made on site at individual homes or factories. Energy can be stored in batteries or sold to the power grid. Perhaps the greatest advantage of this clean renewable resource is that it can be utilized on the power grid during intermediate and peak periods which coincidentally occur during the sunlight hours. Solar power will replace the need for natural gas generators which are used more frequently to supply variable power needs as intermediate- or peak-load generators. Burning natural gas release methane a molecule that is 60 times more potent than CO2 at trapping heat.
Hoping to come back before the missions conference with a short post... Until then, have a great weekend!
If you're an actor, here are a few tips you can apply when auditioning for (or performing in) commercials.
The stars were brilliant and the water oily. Occasionally there had been a muffled thud or deadened explosion within the ship. Now, without warning, she seemed to start forward, moving forward and into the water at an angle of about 15 degrees. This movement, with the water rushing up toward us was accompanied by a rumbling roar, mixed with more muffled explosions.
The point of the query is to win an agent’s attention and get a request for sample pages. Now, your sample pages have to hold up. The greatest query letter in the world is not going to compensate for unready sample pages.
Beauty comes at a price, and for me, it’s a lonely price.
Thought for the Day: Look to the example Jesus pointed to: children.
“Oh,” he says nonchalantly. ”There are a lot of team ropers minus a thumb.”
He was given to understand that it was not.
In the meantime we enjoyed our beer. The selection due to space was not that great but there was a couple of ales and a few continental lagers on tap.
never again will my people be shamed.
be missing from his mental warehouse, and taking stock to assure
They're not profiting from it, asshole. Whomever they give their money to, donating funds to a third party is unambiguously an act of charity, whereas the state giving taxpayers' money to charity is an act of political patronage. These people are choosing to finance your precious Big Society rather than pay for the state's bureaucracy - a bureaucracy which gives £12 billion a year to charities in any case, including to such organisations as Action on Smoking and Health, the School Food Trust, the Equality Challenge Unit, Alcohol Concern and all the other fake charities that no one would donate to if they had a choice.
Record: 14:2-2-4 / $132,611
Having worked to produce reggae remixes for a variety of artists, the Radio Riddler 'Purple Rain' project is a extension of their love of all things reggae and of Prince in particular. According to an interview that FLC drummer Frank Benbini did late last year, the album is a true labor of love that originally came about as a lark and took on a life of its own.
"Good lord," his companion exclaimed. "You don't have a snowball's chance in hell of hitting her from here."
I took my dropship and made a few random bases throughout the map. Got me a little bit of minerals before he went around and destroyed them. He began to mock me, saying things like "Wow, you absolutely suck" and "Give up yet? You have nothing left lol". No, good sir, I don't give up until I know I'm beaten.
Since 1999 we have earnestly been clearing and letting go of the accumulated baggage that has not served us during our present and multiple lifetimes. Much of the time it has been nearly impossible to remain detached from our process and anchored firmly in the present. Now however, we have released so much of what was blocking our Light that we are able to inhabit the authenticity of our truest expression within physical form. The result of this anchoring and unadulterated focus creates the divine dynamic necessary for implementing our expanded potential on earth, and most notably, our capability to more easily manipulate matter with our minds.
I’m sending $100 to Delores to supplement her efforts to provide for herself, beyond the childcare jobs she’s been doing and volunteer work that keeps her busy and happy. And I’m wishing her and every one of the seniors (like me) who want to be working (unlike me) all the luck in the world finding employment!
The other day I read an article about Fidel Castro poking fun at President Barrack Obama. Apparently, Castro found great amusement in Obama’s plan to wear a “guayabera” shirt at some Latin American summit. I found this to be an amazing story on a couple of levels.
How did we ever end up together?
This region has untold miles of stone walls, many abandoned and overgrown after sheep fever. We also saw horses. And this cinnamon miniature horse – adorable (breed?)
She put her bag down, took her coat off, took the two beer bottles out of her bag and put them on the work surface next to the kitchen sink; then took out the other bottle, looked at it inquisitively and took that with her into her room.
Christian said at least he has the testicle to stand up and say he deserves one more match.
Country: United Kingdom
Obviously, I read Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy in preparation for seeing the movie. I’d never read this acclaimed spy novel and thought it was important to do so before entering the theater. I’m looking forward to seeing the new film despite hearing that it is hard to follow even if you’ve read the book. I’m grateful that I’ll be one step ahead of the non-readers in the audience!
Happy Thursday! I hope your having a great week! I have a card to share with you today that I made using my Imagine! Yeah, my Imagine...can you believe it? I am really happy with the way this card turned out so I may have to work harder at using this machine more often :)
So you're probably aware we brewed an Imperial Vanilla Coffee Stout six months back & many of you have tried the un-aged version in a bottle of which we only have a few remaining.
One wolf is good and does no harm. He lives in harmony with all around him and does not take offense when no offense was intended. It will only fight when it is right to do so and in the right way. This wolf stands for joy, peace, love, hope, sharing, serenity, humility, kindness, benevolence, friendship, empathy, generosity, truth, compassion and faith.
Hohn illustrates his skill as a teacher with numerous literary references, most often to Moby-Dick, although he vacillates to his sense of childhood frivolity with frequent mentions of Carle’s Ten Little Rubber Ducks. In addition to imparting his wisdom on literature (yes, picture books do count as literature), Hohn capably offers lessons of oceanography throughout Moby-Duck and sprinkles in history lessons of other commercial losses at sea as well as of other explorations along the waterways of his journey.
-Marc Jeuland (Olympic Trials Marathoner)
Some may have not.
The music area of the Drawing Room
While my dad still struggles with parallel parking, the three of us are pretty damn good at it.
Cattails should fringe the water’s edge.
Bethany and her husband vacation in Key West and visited this site. It was their first vacation since their honeymoon, seven years prior. That's a long time between vacations, although not that uncommon in the US.
Compared to the other leading teams the Lotus appears to be quite conservative car. However performances in testing and the in particular at the Bahrain GP show the cars looks belie its pace.
Bloomberg BusinessWeek illustrates the fight between Keynsians and freshwater-Chicago-school economists:view chart
My birthday, is on the 18th. Mickey threw me a surprise party on Friday. I got several gifts; a notepad and pen, a coffee gift card, a red dress and 28 1/2 pounds of good bacon.
The dress was a complete surprise, an experiment gone right, and way better in real life than photo. I love it! There is also a cardi and wrap I haven't photographed.
step 2: then, take your mixture and add shitloads more water. By this point there should only be a few molecules of cake in each area of the mixture, but just in case, mix until there is basically no active ingredient.
Whilst not truly onomatopoeic, the point is that I love the sound of win - dow - sill … it's the rising and falling cadence of the syllables that appeal and the added imagery of a sash window being raised and lowered on a Spring morning (or by an enraged news broadcaster) that makes windowsill infinitely more enjoyable than window ledge. (Try it win - dow - ledge … kinda plummets doesn’t it?)
On View Through April 13, 2012
And the thought of doing so scares me shitless. So I make excuses that are half true, procrastinate, and wait for bright shiny epiphanies to fall in my lap.
Hope
1 track
–GREAT GRAY OWL, TWP Rd 240 SW of Water Valley (2, 1 km. S of Water Valley (1), Ron Kube
Nationwide, Col. William Harfoot, the Salvation Army’s national chief secretary, said the increase in demand has been the most dramatic he’s seen in 35 years with the charity. Maintaining some youth programs that provide recreation and music or arts lessons, for instance, can prevent other problems like drug addiction and poverty, he said.
The cases recite a litany of failed defenses to fraud claims, including poor health, English as a second language, failure to understand the statements in the Declaration and PTO form and innocent mistake. None of these arguments have been successful in saving a challenged application or registration.
Which is to say: These matters impact me, too.
It’s publication day for BENT ROAD. I start my day being interviewed by the Tampa Tribune. Husband sends flowers. They’re waiting for me at the coffee shop where I meet the journalist. I spend the rest of the day at home. We’re under a severe weather warning. The windows are leaking. I stuff towels in the sills.
Vincent Cavanagh - Guitar
In just the past 6 months or so, Dylan has become a sports enthusiast. Scratch that. He has become a sports FANATIC! He wants to try every sport out there, and he wants to excel at every sport out there. He is ultra competitive. He does not like losing. Losing, or even less than great performance, results in whining, tears, and rolling around on the ground. He is really hard on himself! If he doesn't play well, bats are thrown, racquets are scraped along the ground, etc. (Right now, Jim's mom is laughing and saying "Uh huh! He's Jim's kid all right!) Being a perfectionist is apparently hereditary?!
A great document-review tool that law firms are utilizing is called Westlaw CaseLogistix. It allows the reviewer to see all the documents in one place. This device allows a legal team to organize, review, analyze, and create any legal document. Westlaw CaseLogistix has features such as grouping similar documents in specific folders while categorizing them by dates and issues, viewing documents in different formats such as PDFs and TIFs, and configuring the interface to include only what one needs.
C: “Mom, I saw a picture of them and they are tadpoles! I told you!”
that we have been filling over the past few weeks and praise God for the so many blessings He has given us.
Astrology as predicative science in Western Context
David Casey
If you could have a superpower, what would it be and why?
May brings a surprise from Hubby--tickets to Nickelback's Here and Now Tour. They will be playing with Seether, My Darkest Days, and Bush. I had no clue Bush was still around, but the other 3 are absolutely off the hook rock bands that I love. And listen to on an almost daily basis while I work out. Then my big boy will be turning 6. And then the summer baby boom discussed above.
What are your event or trade show tips or questions? Leave a comment.
‘We both saw him straddling the body, basically, a foot on both sides of Trayvon’s body and his hands pressed on his back,’ Ms Cutcher said of she and her roommate.
In contrast, this president has made only three speeches on Afghanistan after he adopted a similar surge strategy in 2009. Amid the apologies and the talk of exit strategies, the president has made little mention of progress or commitment.
I also found these two little milk glass like plates and they have dots around the outside which is my new love! They were $0.99 a piece. This ADORABLE apothecary type jar I fell in love with! We all know apothecary jars are all the rage right now. This one has silver top and base! AND to top it off a little bird! Two of my FAVORITE things that I have everywhere! Don’t you love finding one great piece that brings together multiple things in your decorating!! Next to that is also some rub on letters that were $0.99
I leave you today with a little photo of Maggie from hunting eggs this morning...
Christmas morning, we heard Dylan getting up around 5:30. We managed to convince him to stay in bed and go back to sleep. He came into our room at 7:30 anxious to go downstairs. He went down to check and reported back to us that Santa had indeed visited our home. The poor kid then had to wait almost another hour until Ben and Lily woke up so he could go open gifts.
But the next thing I knew I was on Ebay trying to track down red ticking and figuring out how to get a whole bunch of pictures on one piece of transfer paper. I cleared off the one big table I had in my studio at the time and started to go there. When I saw the flag begin to come to life, I knew this was going to be a special piece. I called my friends at The Cowgirl Hall of Fame and Museum in Ft. Worth and told them what I was making and asked them if they wanted first shot at it when it was done. To make a long story short...I finished it in 3 days, sent them the not-exactly-crisp pic you see here and the first"The Women-The Flag" found a home in the permanent collection of the museum in September 2002. It was unveiled at a special ceremony they had on the one year anniversary of that fateful fall day and as far as I know it hangs there today. I have made a few since then and they hang in collections all over the country.
and the tall coughing man stamping an envelope.
While I figure that if adults want to wreck their bodies and give themselves fag faces, not to mention stinky breath (see, toldya I was censorious) then that’s up to them (providing they don’t blow their smoke in my lungs). But when it comes to children, that’s something quite different. Hence this blog post.
The Senior Cat had to visit the bank this morning. I sent him off with a note to give the girls in the greengrocer's. One of the boys in there showed the Senior Cat where to find things. The girls checked and added the carrots!
Finally, we're attending a group called the Support, Training and Education Program (STEP), held at the facility where Brian is currently receiving treatment. This is a 2 hour weekly meeting, with the first hour dedicated to a speaker or some kind of specific topic, and the second hour is support. The majority of the participants have a loved one at the facility, but not always. This group has been invaluable to our own self care, and we have at least tried out many of the suggestions we've learned about on those evenings.
Last, riding these highway buses today, I realize how dependent I am on this cell phone for travel. If it wasn't for the Internet, my meticulous planning, and the ability to verify things instantly on the go, I doubt I could be taking such an ambitious trip on my own. Signage at the stops is limited and in Japanese only, of course. Train station staff know little or nothing about the highway buses, and nobody around here speaks English. But the challenge makes it that much more fun!
Linds
Nick: “Hmmm…how about a grilled cheese?”
Lately I have been struggling a lot with jealousy. I’m not normally a jealous person and I really don’t like the feeling. There are so many verses on jealousy and how awful it is.
Sure, they don’t save the sick from a terminal disease. They can’t build a building higher than the Empire State. They can’t put the gas in the tanks that keep our economy moving. But they offer something else important:
The Serpentine Column has one of the longest literary histories of any object surviving from Greek and Roman antiquity — its provenance is not in doubt and it is at least 2,487 years old. Together with its original golden tripod and bowl (both long missing), it constituted a trophy, or offering, dedicated to Apollo at Delphi. This offering was made in the spring of 478 BC, several months after the defeat of the Persian army in the Battle of Plataea (August, 479 BC) by those Greek city-states in alliance against the Persian invasion of mainland Greece (see Greco-Persian Wars). Among the writers who allude to the Column in the ancient literature are Herodotus, Thucydides, Demosthenes, Diodorus Siculus, Pausanias the traveller, Cornelius Nepos and Plutarch.The removal of the column by the Emperor Constantine to his new capital, Constantinople, is described by Edward Gibbon, citing the testimony of the Byzantine historians Zosimus, Eusebius, Socrates, and Sozomenus.”
At dinner this evening he launched into a big long story about the fire drill at nursery and the fact that they will be setting up a little “catapillow” farm in his classroom. He told us the whole catapillow to butterfly process in surprisingly grown up detail.
Standing up in the midst of pain is key in this Savage World; that you are no longer just living in, but beginning to own!
- Potential markets for key regions of Asia-Pacific, Europe, Americas and MEA.
Think whole body is tied up into a knot.
Perry had his own stem cells injected into his back.
As someone who has been in 3 long term relationships, and turned down more than a few guys who wanted me to be their girlfriend, here are my tips for becoming girlfriend material.
Round 1: Magic Ring, 8 sc. Pull tight to close. Join with sl st to first sc.
You’re the letter from Jesus on the bathroom wall
A movie advertisement. They will have to change the title if they want to release it in the US. Imagine all the offended conservatives and Christians confronted with such language! (Puts her hand to forehead and faints)
After Philly, I made it back to Cleveland (last time here was February and I’m supposed to be retired!?!). I have a couple days off and I’ll be leaving Saturday for Burlington, Vermont. From there I’ll head up to Quebec for my second race outside the U.S.A.
I knew exactly what I wanted to be
But I prevailed.
My Students:
Time passing slowly as I wait
100 ml of cooking oil
Like I said, he was brutal.
And the last time I read about anything being burned in Mauritania, it was not the books of Islamic jurisprudence that include mention of slavery, it was approval being granted for Chinese residents to build funeral pyres to cremate their dead. There are a lot of Chinese store owners, business people and workers in Mauritania, and China is an essential trading and investment partner. So we need not be concerned or surprised by the double standard of allowing burial rituals that are not in the Islamic tradition, while simultaneously telling people to forget democracy, Mauritania is a nation of Islam and they are all soldiers in the fight to defend their faith.
Sinclair
We then flew to Missouri in the middle of the country to meet up with the Kauffman Foundation, the World’s largest charity devoted to entrepreneurship and finished with a series of meetings at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) on the East Coast of America.
As always, it started off by gathering the ingredients.
1. The Furthest Point
5 chances on twitter according to the following schedule:
When you’re married a while, you fall into certain patterns. One is that when we’re driving home after midnight, my wife likes to put the seat back and sleep. Not in the SL550. She kept talking about the car. It’s so silent with the top up, she noticed. That’s the advantage of a folding hardtop I explained. We drove on and my wife stayed awake the entire time, just talking about the SL550 and how much she liked it. I can honestly say that’s neverhappened before, both her staying awake and talking about a car. Seriously, I don’t think ever. And when we pulled in and parked she turned to me and said, “Do you think Mercedes would give me one of these for a week? I’d totally write them a review.” Whoa, did she ever love this thing.
The same is said about Pakistan, that it survived despite all odds and especially our “Islamic bomb” is considered god’s biggest “miracle”. How meaningless it sounds when we study the status of national integrity and the deep mess we are in. Indeed the history tells us is that it’s all rhetoric – plain rhetoric.
CONTEST! My husband, author Matthew David Becket, is running a contest on his Twitter, @MatthewBecket - the winner gets a hardcover of our book "Vampire Art Now" (signed by us both as co-authors), and a signed print of my "Bellissimo Letto" Vampire! All rules & entry info can be found here:
I had seen Sally Potter's The Tango Lesson years before I worked up the courage to take my first lesson. And when I did, I was so focused on it, to the detriment of all other activities and relationships. That's a normal phase that most tango dancers go through. Then there comes a time when the basics are dealt with, and you feel comfortable dancing with people outside of the classroom, that you begin to see the bigger picture. That you have a way to communicate with someone, at times a very profound and real way of interacting with people on an individual basis where your name, what you do for a living and any other trappings of life mean nothing and all that matters is how two bodies navigate a crowded dance floor.
I am lucky enough to have a second computer, a nice PC, but I do miss my Mac. It was just more... intuitive. Artistic. Quieter. Sleeker. More... me.
‘I’m very pleased to meet you.’
One of my many peculiarities is that I cannot cross the road: a) unless the green man at the pedestrian crossing has given the all clear, and b) without running across said road like a bat out of hell. Both a) and b) are prime ingredients for social awkwardness, particularly when you are in the presence of someone who perhaps does not know you very well. This happened a few weeks ago when I was out for lunch with some of the other trainees. I imagine that prior to our little outing they probably thought I was a normal human being. They possibly even thought I was cool. They now know the truth however.
The tiny Libertarian party, with no resources, almost no people, and very little media exposure, is understood pretty clearly and accurately by most marginally informed people. And from what they know of Libertarians, Liberals—those who aren't actually communist thugs—generally approve of them—even thought their message is unremittingly about severely limited government and maximum individual liberty—pretty much the exact opposite of the Democratic message!
The one word that seems to be overused in the wrong context is ‘of’ – ie: “I am fed up of the weather.” “I would of taken the short route” “you could of told me earlier” &etc. the ‘of’ word seems to have taken place of ‘with’ and ‘have’…. Now I also noticed that most of the offenders are under 40 years old, so have deduced that it is either the fault of the education authorities dumbing down their English lessons and examinations, or the dumbing down of the spoken word. I must admit I enjoy the English language and have always tried to ensure that my spelling and grammar is correct – possibly to do with my strict teachers!
I am not a chocolate person and don't really do eggs but I love Easter.
Checked on the basement. Down to about six inches left. I managed to run a power cord to the fridge for the time being so the food in the freezer is safe. I suppose I could light stove with a match for cooking but I'm eating things that require no cooking for the now. We may need the propane later so I'll get by with peanut butter on a roll. As long as we have the Generator there doesn't seem to be a rush.
down the staircase.
I went to my sister’s apartment today and saw her 2 babies. Along the way, I bought the biggest baby some really cute hair clips, hair bands and stuff, multicoloured and flowery, girly, cute. And for the little month old baby, I bought a red heart shaped soft pillow to go in her cot (or, a crib, whatever floats your boat!). My sister really liked the gifts and said they were perfect and exactly what they needed. The little one doesn’t really have any teddy bears or anything, so this is something nice and soft to put in her cot. And the older baby’s hair is getting really long so clips and hair bands are great.
driven on,
- Rondo with his triple double coming back from his sit-out suspension for bumping the ref and being his tricky self.
(3) Moulding.—
Our theme for you this months is
DAY 14: Put together homeless kits
The weather has finally started to cooperate and the sap is running. Last weekend the first of the sugarhouse restaurants opened up. So yesterday Trisha and I made plans to go to South Face Farm Sugarhouse. I'd been salivating for weeks thinking about the waffle with blueberries and maple syrup that I'd have there. Since my lap band surgery, I have had lots of trouble eating breakfast, and usually manage to barely eat 1/4th of a waffle. So we planned to go for lunch. I got up early enough to have a huge cup of decaf and a breakfast bar and get some housework done. When Trisha called and said she'd be right up, I took my book and sat outside in the sun. It felt so good when the wind was quiet! The sun was dazzling and the roof was dripping. We took off on our scenic ride to Ashfield.
Nature is not there to use as we please. As with any relationship, there is give and take. Nature gives of its bounty to serve humanity and in return humanity is meant to help nature in its spiritual evolution. For example, how we treat animals is essential. When we show love and care to animals we help them in their own evolution. When we help animals, we are also helping ourselves to evolve. It’s our responsibility to treat them well. When we mistreat animals, we lose spiritual power and may find ourselves being mistreated in some way, not by animals, but by situations as a way to open our hearts.
Last week was a very busy one for Markets - as well as our usual weekly markets, we had 2 extra events. The first was on Easter Monday at Gressenhall Museum - we were in a lovely new marquee in the courtyard, with much more space and light (not that you can tell that from the photo!). The weather did not join in the celebrations though - it rained all day, and everyone was thoroughly damp and cold by the end of the day - and that was just us who'd been dry inside, the poor visitors were decidedly bedraggled!
Never in my life have I been able to describe how I write books until that moment. It became even more clear when Ellen responds by saying that when she designs architecture, she feels as if she's DISCOVERING it, not necessarily creating it.
I've already shared, in two different posts, what happened to me a couple of years ago. And in the second of those posts, I let you know it was in a government office, a very political office.
Iván Meade - What would be your dream project if you were given carte blanche?
Features 10 waves, 6 different bombs types, multiple powerups, an upgrade shop, and an ever growing city! Uses keyboard and mouse. Instructions provided in
19 Fuckcess
....we started our summer 2012 Lintsi- season!! They opened last weekend and one of my good friends works there so we just had to go~
Better than cutting the hedge!
Searchlight is able to maximise the opportunities for both the funding, and for the dissemination, of its hatemongering efforts.
I could be absolutely exhausted and falling asleep in front of the TV but as soon as I climb into bed my brain starts running around the track:
In auditioning material to clean up for my Iain Burgess series, I've had the opportunity to inspect a lot of assorted vinyl transfers from vintage mid-80s punk vinyl.
But...but...if I get under 29% body fat I can forgo the fine AND eat whatever I want! I'm kind of a cheap skate, which doesn't help me resist this ridiculous, dictator-imposed goal. Then there's the fact that I'd weigh less than I did in high school, and I secretly want to see if that's even possible.
More recently a few carriers have introduced critical illness riders to their policies. This was a major breakthrough for the industry! Life insurance policies that allow insureds to accelerate a discounted portion of the death benefit if they suffer a critical illness such as heart attack, stroke or the diagnosis of cancer, in addition to other types of critical illness as outlined in the contract. Now, life insurance policies can be used during the insured’s lifetime to offset the enormous cost of a terminal, chronic or critical illness.
"...Black pundits say that to be black and Republican makes one a despicable race-traitor worthy of no-holds-barred punishment. As a black conservative Republican, I'm not frightened by this; it just angers and frustrates me.
This is NOT my recipe. This recipe was generously shared by my friend Jess on Facebook and she also generously granted me permission to share it here (thanks Jess!).
Wednesday to Saturday 12 noon to 1am
The Jesuits are also flooding the United States with aliens, most of which are Catholic. Not only are we being defeated by the Jesuit enemy within, we are constantly being invaded by an army of aliens from without. These aliens dilute the traditional American society that understands our Constitution and how it works. This makes it much easier for the Jesuits in congress to pass the unconstitutional laws so damaging to the United States. And, of course, along with these aliens come the people who actually blow up the buildings.
My "Advisory Team" of 30 lovelies that I like to refer to as The Butterfly Girlz have shared their lives and their best advice with me for the book and the girls from "the gathering" group on facebook, which is comprised of 230+ girls from around the country, is always buzzing with issues, advice, girls crying out for help.
We are witnessing a diplomatic failure as great as the failure to predict the collapse of Soviet communism. Revolts in the Arab world are coming in a manner and from a quarter the experts never expected. With luck, we are also seeing the end of one of the most discreditable episodes in British diplomacy since Chamberlain and Halifax appeased the European fascists in the 1930s.
Through Leaving Not a Coat Unturned,
"I like these better."
The crowd, which filled the upstairs room at the Federal, was on its feet, boding well for the future of the venue as a jazz magnet.
9) Do you agree with the advantages that he lists for the two types?
There are no magical pills that can ensure your weight loss. Losing weight requires a mindset and a will power. A little change in lifestyle and a balanced diet will surely give you amazing results. Most people think that exercising on heavy and expensive equipments will make them lose weight quickly. This is a very wrong perception. You can lose weight through natural weight loss therapy which means to work. It does not require more time and therefore people can make it as the best part time.
Wouldn't it be nice if we had a button to hit when we need to be refreshed? Like webpages, we too need a way to recharge – our imagination, our writing, our career, and, sometimes life itself.
First, the painter’s tape apparently didn’t form a strong enough seal around the ceiling and trim, so after two long days of careful painting, I ripped off the tape only to find that the paint had seeped through in many places. 4 days and many touch-ups with tiny paintbrushes later, it finally looked presentable, and I had only dropped a few dozen
Anyway, yesterday she wanted to paint but her tiny little stuffed up nose and not so tiny cough warranted a bath.
Also, with Arte Publico Press/Pinata Books: another collection of stories accepted, likely to be called Devil's Dance: Stories from Beyond. The stories are more contemporary takes on Mexican American cucuy legends: la llorona, la mano pachona, the devil at the dance, and the like. Hopefully this one will also come in a bilingual edition. More meant for middle and high school readers than something like Xavier Garza's Creepy Creatures and his more recent Kid Cyclone books, which I'd say are more for older elementary and middle school readers. But it'll be cool to be in the same space as him.
This season was hard. So hard. But I learned that God is there even when we don't feel Him. He is working on us even when we don't realize it. He loves it when we cry out to Him. And He is faithful even when we are not.
The first is colored straight, no blending. The second is blended and the shadows scribbled in, the third is ready to cut and make into a card. I missed a spot when I blended out the last monster. See it? I caught it before I made it into a card, though. The totally cute Monster is from Dustin's December Membership offering. He's a Members Only image. Membership totally has its privileges! Check out the membership information here.
IMHO: I think we concerned Carroll Gardeners should at least start a petition - although a protest wall would be a more suitable option. Who's with me?
In the above picture, you can also see how I would tie a bandana to each of the straps. I would use one to mop my face (it's HOT!) and have the other for back-up. I might use that one to cover my face (love it when it doesn't rain, but then it's crazy dusty) or as a napkin if I forgot to grab one (or there wasn't any available) or protect my scalp from the sun and shield my eyes when I didn't have my hat.
"Is that right?" he asked, giving me an approving once-over. "Wow, that didn't even take you a whole year!"
What I loved: The universal themes and the intimate view of family life in Korea.
BF: Getting back to the blowing up of the underground bases, this group was being cut off more and more at a high level, and they were running out of money.
Samuel Smith Old Brewery (Tadcaster) Samuel Smith's India Ale
Right now I’m supposed to be finishing book three for a Fall 2013 release, but I’m actually working on a rewrite of a YA pop space opera called Intergalactic. It’s very different from my White Forest series, which is a nice break for me. It’s a humourous satire about a fading Intergalactic pop star. Sort of Douglas Adams meets Lady Gaga.
Don't get me wrong...the room is far from finished. It still needs window treatments, I would love some Louis side chairs for the table, and a rug to anchor the whole space. But for now I'm happy with the progress and it has definitely been transformed from the previous "dog crate dining room" we lived with for 2 years. And yes, we actually do eat more dinners in here as a couple. Amazing how that happens.
On the research side, there is a lot of interest in whether thrombolysis could be given to more patients, extending its use beyond the current 4.5-hour post-onset treatment window. Animal studies show that cooling body temperature can significantly reduce the area of brain affected by strokes. In March, funding was announced for EuroHYP-1, a study due to involve 1500 ischaemic stroke patients in 15 European countries that aims to determine whether cooling can improve outcomes.
The Forty-Five Guardsmen (1847) (Les Quarante-cinq)
Dry scalp is a problem for a lot of people, myself included, and it particularly troublesome this time of year.
There are over a billion people today who know Jesus as the way to salvation and eternal life.
"It is mind boggling for us Israelis to look at what happens in North America, because we went through this 50 years ago," said Rafi Sela, the president of AR Challenges, a global transportation security consultancy. He has worked with the RCMP, the U.S. Navy Seals and airports around the world.
Also, the police approach to and their handling of the crime-scene seems rather slack and unprofessional, to say the least! The crime-scene did not present itself when the first shot was fired; the scene was already a ‘potential’ crime the moment Mr du Plessis reported the matter, but it was obviously not treated as such. Since when do the police allow almost the entire family to accompany them to a scene? Surely one person is all they need to point out the location?
Thanks for visiting, and be sure to check out the following challenges, where I've entered this card.
What is truth?
Settling.
replace already broken-down
The current thinking is to separate academic achievement from work ethic — and definitely to avoid being benevolent to the student you perceive as hardworking, or strict with the one you see as lazy. Let students earn academic grades based on their academic knowledge and success; giving high marks to a student who does not know the material is no favor to anyone, the argument goes.
But sometimes, I’m not so sure.
She's not that adventurous, she prefers quiet activities indoors to boisterous ones outside, but also has a very good attention span and will sit for ages doing some drawing or practising her writing.
I enjoyed a pint (or two) of this beer while packaging and it was quite delicious. There's an assertive bitterness, but a complex malt character that lets the yeast express itself. This is the second batch I've made with the Rogue Pacman yeast and it tasted more Rogue-like than the first.
I am the gate. Whoever enters through me will be saved, and will come in and go out and find pasture.
What can we learn from this first auction?
Should the last line of Genesis,
An example of this is my hierarchy of spirits. Doing a little research into the original Arabic djinn, I discovered there were (and are) believed to be five main orders: Marids (the most powerful), Afrits (or Efrit/Ifrits), the Shaitan, the Jinn and the Jann. I liked putting Bart into a firm hierarchy, but I adapted it to my own design. Marids I kept, and Afrits, but Shaitan had to go for fairly obvious etymological reasons; Jinn was okay, but Jann was too similar, so I binned that as well. My 5 levels became: Marids, Afrits, Djinn, Foliots (a word I thought I made up; annoyingly, it also turns out to be a technical term for a portion of a clock) and Imps. These last are very much in the European tradition of small, ugly, goblinish creatures, and have very little to do with anything Arabic at all. In terms of power, Bart is very much in the middle of the hierarchy (despite his boasts to the contrary); whenever he’s not bullying the rubbish foliots and imps, he’s having to grudgingly kow-tow to the swaggering afrits he comes across. This isn’t the only way in which Bart’s mythic world echoes the structures and restrictions of our mundane human one.
just when I have recognized that, i decided to make a list
Some parents can use authoritarian parenting and their kids obey. Most assume it's because the parents have some special trick. Or assume their own kids are defective unlike the authoritarian parents' kids.
Julia Cameron also talks a lot about this, in her well-loved guide to creativity, The Artist's Way. As I understand it, Cameron originally wrote it for creative artists who were stuck, who were not doing their art anymore. The idea was to actually acknowledge the stuckness, to almost embrace it (morning pages), then begin to give yourself creative alternatives. Try new things, let go of how we "should" be doing it. Only then can the imagination stir, buzz inside us, give us those ideas that might lead to a breakthrough. Cameron very gently assigned readers a weekly artist date: to spend an hour exploring something completely unknown.
On another note, I did a quick project in my laundry room that really added a fun pop of color. I hung some 70s framed tiles that my parents used to have hanging in their vacation home. My Dad just recently sent them to me.
Good Luck and be nice out there!
At BetOnline.com, Tiger Woods was listed at -118 over Rory McIlroy (-102). Sportsbook.com had Tiger at +400, and McIlroy at +500. At Bovada, Tiger is listed at 7/2 to win The Masters, while McIlroy is listed at 9/2.
Wise readers and sewists of differing skill levels, what are your favorite resources regarding fit? Along with too many encyclopedic sewing guides, I have the aforementioned Singer The Perfect Fit and yesterday ordered an old edition of Fit for Real People on Amazon, though it doesn't specifically address men's bodies. A shoulder is a shoulder, right? And I'm a real person, sort of.
and I have been following each other for a while now. She lives in the beautiful city of Bellevue, Washington not far from where I will be moving to in the spring!
Or, as the philosophers of Zuccotti Park call them, the 1 percent. For Obama, these rich are the ones holding back the 99 percent. The “breathtaking greed of a few” is crushing the middle class. If only the rich paid their “fair share,” the middle class would have a chance. Otherwise, government won’t have enough funds to “invest” in education and innovation, the golden path to the sunny uplands of economic growth and opportunity.Continue reading.
Part one of a three part series of beers brewed in partnership between Sierra Nevada Brewing and New Clairvaux, an actual honest-to-god monastery in California. Ken Grossman, the owner of Sierra Nevada is extremely interested in traditional abbey ales, brewed with the seasons. It's a bold departure from the brewery's obvious strength, hoppy American ales.
“God did not create marriage just to give us a pleasant means of repopulating the world and providing a steady societal institution to raise children. He planted marriage among humans as yet another signpost pointing to His own eternal, spiritual existence.”
Which means that this transition is going to be hard, with him going to live with someone new. And that’s why I need to share one more bit of info with you….His name’s not Reggie. I don’t know what made me do it, but when I dropped him off at the shelter, I told them his name was Reggie. He’s a smart dog, he’ll get used to it and will respond to it, of that I have no doubt but I just couldn’t bear to give them his real name. For me to do that, it seemed so final, that handing him over to the shelter was as good as me admitting that I’d never see him again. And if I end up coming back, getting him, and tearing up this letter, it means everything’s fine.
And because our ponds all have constant running water, you will not find any muddy smell lingering on the fish delivered to your homes.
4. Using very clean electric beaters and mixing bowl, beat
My colleague arrives. We follow the stream towards the campus. The rain stops. Today we are in Gakushuin University. This is where the emperors of Japan are educated. Our presentations are in a building which used to be the dormitory for the royal students. The dorms are classrooms now. It is still a working university, but accepts regular students as well as the elite these days. I wonder which room Emperor Hirohito stayed in while he studied here. He had a keen interest in marine biology. I imagine him sitting here at night studying sketches of skeletons and illustrated jellyfish, unconcerned with what the future might expect of him. Unaware of whom he would become, or of what that might mean.
Changes of clothes, snacks, toys, and books. All part of the preparation involved in taking a toddler to the shops just 45 minutes away.
Dr. Lund measured perceptions among current and former smokers of the risks of snus compared with cigarettes. Here are the results for former smokers:
Just another way that things have changed since I became a mom. If you are looking for somewhere to donate some of your love and finances to, these are some of the organizations that I have fallen in love with. Check them out if you get a chance:
Paul Groves (tenor)
I am that bread of life. Jn. 6:48
Exercise the Excellent.
iAfrica.com
Pursuing new interests, further developing passions, and setting goals. Three expressions of a creative heart that is realizing the world of writing has infinite possibility and can be encountered. I have set out to build a wordpress archive to practice describing life stories, expounding on my own thoughts and wonderment, and to learn how to write for children. The organization of my ‘blog’ will come together eventually, but for now its a melting pot of posts, links, quotes, and hopefully will not get to out of hand.
"I say this because I know what I am planning for you," says the Lord. " I have good plans for you, not plans to hurt you. I will give you hope and a good future."
What will also encourage me is if I start receiving some sponsorship for this run. After all, I'm not doing it for my own health!! In fact, at my age, the money I raise by doing this run may well have to go towards my knee replacement! But seriously, if any of you wish to sponsor me for this run, all proceeds going to support BASICS-London, and the doctors that volunteer, just click on the PayPal link to the right. Do post a message along with your donation - we always like to hear words of encouragement.
Film: Fuji Generic ISO 200
That’s right, Bitches!
Doing some power squats- don’t hate if you haven’t tried ‘em.
This is a quick post. We had a terrible wind storm with winds between 130 and 140 km/hr winds which blew everything apart up here. Our power went out at home on Monday at 7:30 a.m. and have since found out that it could be off until Thursday 11 p.m. or later. My teeth are starting to chatter! It snowed twice today along with hail at one point. You can see your breath inside the house!
This book focuses in the relationship between animals and plants who live under water, in the oceans, through the different seasons of the years. It will show feeding relationships between animals and interactions between them and their environment. Some animals adaptations are explained by showing how animals migrate to other habitats in order to survive. At the end of the book, there is a great tool for teachers and students, some food web cards that specify the prey and predator of a specific specie. Also a brief summary on how seasons change and what happens in this ecosystem is explained. Finally an ocean food web is also offered.
Left Hand Warrior IPA; Longmont, Colorado, India Pale Ale, 6.8% abv
Keri got her new sleeping bag. I’m going to see if she’ll let me try it for a night and post up the differences between my bag system and hers. I can also shoot some photos of her bag packed versus my 0 degree Ultralamina. The size difference is quite comical.
Thanks for visiting us and I hope to see you again soon :)
If you treat yourselves with kindness, others will treat you kind in return.
It's been perfect for me to organise and sort through my scrap stash. I don't have a lot of room for it, and to be honest, I'm so sick of how it looks so messy all the time. So sick of how it makes the HOUSE look so messy all the time!!
The Queen by Steven James
and don't forget to link up your blog!
Several areas of the brain are active when we meditate, but most pronounced is the prefrontal cortex because when we meditate we are focusing our attention on something — whether that be the body, our breathing, a word, a candle or even a spiritual ideal. When this area is active, just like a muscle being exercised, it grows.
CL: Hi my name is Chris and I am run a website called Islam in Action. I am calling in regards to the Senator's TV statement that the Fort Hood attack had nothing to do with Islam or the war. How did he come up with this statement, when the evidence clearly shows us otherwise? I can read off plenty of Koran quotes which show that this act was in accordance with Islam.
It was during these days at sea I appeared on the in-ship TV show The WAKE with JJ Knight, our Cruise Director. You can see me above wearing one of the latest styles from acstudio9.com.
1 God is our refuge and strength, a very present help in trouble.
The report, which Sumaila co-edited with Robert Diaz of the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, encompasses studies from an international team of economists, ocean scientists and others who attempt to “tally the costs and savings associated with human decisions affecting ocean health,” according to a summary of the publication. Diaz said in a statement that the report provides an overview of “the state of the science for six threats to the global ocean, what can happen if all these threats act together, and the economic consequences of taking or not taking action.” Overall, the researchers estimate that eroding ocean health will translate—unless environmental reforms take hold—into a $428-million annual loss to the global economy within 40 years. That cost will rise to $1.979 trillion per year by the end of this century if nothing is done to curb detrimental human impacts on the oceans. …
My friend and I went out to a sports bar this past Monday to watch Game 2 of the Capitals Rangers series. While we were there we were, of course, in our Caps gear and cheering loud for our team. By the third period a Rangers fan came in with some friends (Bruins fan and Flyers fan), saw us and sat down at the table next to us. The chirping began almost immediately.
I'm sure it's because now I'm not chasing a ton of half and half with sugar or using flavored creamers. Not to mention that Oreo that always went so well with my coffee EVERY morning.
-I saw him, Bobby, I saw the animal and it was bigger than a grizzly bear.
I wished with all my heart that the girls would pick up on my longing to go to Glencoe and to read the book...and....they did. They decided we would make the pilgrimage and Is read the book all the way as we passed through a more and more amazing landscape.
However, French lawyer Joseph Brehem had rebutted Zahid’s statement yesterday, saying that the French courts have jurisdiction over anyone involved in an inquiry.
Saturday, 7th May @Brown Thomas: 12pm, 1pm, 2pm, 3pm. 4pm.
Paul Tough in What if the Secret to Success is Failure (New York Times, 14 September 2011) writes that there are those “who argue that the systems and methods now in place to raise and educate well-off kids in the United States are in fact devastating them.”
I think packing up to move to a new city and working at something while you achieve your true dreams is commitment. A huge commitment. Once you get to the City there are a lot of opportunities available to those who are searching for jobs in publishing. Both NYU and Columbia have publishing programs. I'll let others comment on the usefulness of those. I don't think they are at all necessary (I know more people who did not do those than did), but I understand they can be good for networking.
She answers back ‘How do you NOT?’
I also doubt their household was a paradise, but it was an island of social rebels hidden far beyond laws of convention. It was Holloway who told Marston that his comic book character needed to be a woman. She was a bit of an Amazon herself, living 99 years and, more wondrously, supporting all four children and Byrne after Marston’s death in 1947.
ok ok… it looks grotesquely green i know. I added Koepoe Koepoe’s pandan paste when I noticed that the batter wasn’t coloring up much after the concentrated pandan juice was added. But 2 tsps of pandan paste is admittingly an overkill. maybe I would just add 3 tsps of concentrated pandan juice and 1 tsp of pandan paste next time. But aroma is fantastic and far more natural that those by Bake King or Red Man.
Written Monday 1/25:
Jennifer has lots of information about the Modern Mini Challenge here. There's a contest going on... and prizes (umm... you could win some of the Flea Market Fancy reprint by Denyse Schmidt!)!
The Roman Church was furious when it found out about this. The pope wrote a letter telling Luther he must recant from what he wrote — to publically take back what he said. And they said he must also burn his writings. If Luther did not recant, the pope would excommunicate (remove) him from the Church.
This was the first time she was seeing David in a movie since...well, since interacting with the real David.
Ok, let's get stuck into it. Again I'm not going to use abbreviations to make it easier for all of you!
Hwei-Ling Greeney, Chair of the Committee on Homelessness pointed out that the Housing Partnership has been in existence for almost 30 years and did nothing for the homeless. Ms. Greeney also observed that individual Select Board members did not show up this past winter at the shelter to drop off food or play cards with guests, yet now they are making this momentous decision impacting the shelter.
Crisp-skinned Roast Chicken
Every beam of sunlight
The rest was, as we say history and Dragonette was born with a marriage soon on the horizon.Later on in that year, Joel Stouffer (drums) and Will Stapleton (guitar) rounded out the line-up and they were soon asked to open up for Duran Duran’s US tour after only being a together for eight months.
Given the options, it’s always a risk that young Christians may not vote, King said.
If Your Way of Keeping Tabs on the Global Economy
There are 3 main agendas the designer wanted to achieve with this house. First, the retrofitting has to be cost effective. Secondly, as responsible earthlings, it has to be a sustainable design. Last but not least, to create a symbiosis of Art and Design.
In this posting I am sharing some of the Luminous Mystery images I have collected and also what our family altar looks like and how the slideshow works in with our family altar.
Bruce isn’t one for funerals or emotion. He doesn’t talk about his feelings or ask me about mine much. He does tangible things to show his love and support, like refinishing a piece of furniture.
I don’t have any photos for this, other than my spiral. What goes around comes around again and again. I’m always grateful for the opportunity to learn a new lesson.
Being a Taeyang fan is all about patience and seeing as I’m an impatient person by nature this news couldn’t have come at a better time. I’m so excited to hear what Taeyang has in store for us, especially the songs he created with The Underdogs Harvey Mason Jr, Damon Thomas & Eric Dawkins. When it comes to Taeyang rekindling his love for bandanas I’m all for it. I adore the look.
Which brings me to my question. As most of you know, I was very close with one of Keven's friends who I referred to as "Kelly" on my old blog. She and Keven were like brother and sister, and looked so much alike that they were often mistaken for siblings. Even when Keven was not around she'd come by to see me and I was there for her through a lot of her addiction and boyfriend issues. For the last six months we saw less and less of each other and at one point (on Keven's last run) I knew she was using with him so I cut her out of my life by blocking her number from my phone.
No Man of Her Own
Follow these simple steps to get yours!
Much measuring ensued at this point. Can the crib and changing table (the green cabinet in that first picture) both fit beyond this unit? Yes, but not well. And that doesn’t feel right anyway. The more I thought about it, and the 6-foot paper storage desk I want to put in the studio, the more I realized the only real solution is to flip sides – Nursery to the right, studio to the left. Move all of this:
The twenty-one essays in Farther Away run the gamut from humorous to academic to language-obsessive to intensely personal, but there’s something in it that will appeal to everyone. I realize Franzen is an acquired taste for some people, but if you enjoy his fiction and are looking to dip into his nonfiction, this would probably be the book to do it with (The Discomfort Zone can be hit or miss, and while I’ve heard excellent things about How to Be Alone, I haven’t read it and can’t vouch for it yet). His ability to craft an essay is remarkable, and though I didn’t initially intend to devour the book in a few sittings, that’s exactly what ended up happening.
3. No, I used to. Now...I just go with the feeling or what I am doing that day. I just try not to make any huge fashion mistakes if I am going out in public. Otherwise, I might stay in my jammies all day.
I should also preface this description with an explanation of a habit of mine. I am always using my tongue to feel my teeth. It’s constant. When I’m not doing anything, I’m feeling my front right bottom incisor tooth. I have this little sharp part that I imagine I’m sanding down over time. (In all reality I’m probably just scraping up my tongue, but no matter.)
A best selling remedy is Cuprum Metallicum for muscle cramps and leg cramps.
If I care about you, and you care about me, that’s everyone covered, everyone loved, and nobody needs maintaining any more. I’m not Gandhi, but I think that’s a pretty good philosophy for life.
I first thought of "Down the Rabbit-Hole", but thought that sounded too much like the "Alice" blog.
The results of the first round of the French Presidential elections have predictably ended in Sarkozy and Hollande going through to the second round in two weeks time. Sarkozy did worse than had been expected, and Hollande slightly better. Sarkozy had hoped to have been slightly ahead in the first round. In fact, he trailed Hollande by nearly three percentage points. What was slightly less predictable was the size of the vote for the Front National candidate, Marine le Pen, who obtained around 19% of the vote. The Left Front candidate, Melonchon, who had been showing at around 15% in recent opinion polls actually only polled around 12%.
With the muck fortress at their disposal, it was not much of a challenge to pick up the stallions. And money was not much of a problem since money was still pouring in through the snake oil sales on e-bay. However it would soon run out. He had to quickly think of another way to fund his remaining adventures. He had seen how internet on mobile had helped him so much. So he could sense the need for the product in this world. And he would have absolute monopoly in this market. So he searched on the internet for best deals on mobile phones and invested money in buying 20-25 handsets and Vodafone internet connection packs for all of them.
Dae Su's very idea of revenge is changed. While he imagines that killing the man who wronged him was all there was to it. He comes to realize that it isn't so simple. Given the chance to kill Woo Jin, he stops when he's reminded that if he does, he won't know "why." Obviously, knowing the why, gives him no satisfaction at all, only deepens his problems, but he discovers that the knowing is as much a part of his quest as the retribution. Neither man ends up satisfied with his revenge. Woo Jin's inability to let go of his sister is only increased, and we get the sense that he planned to kill himself anyway, his revenge on Dae Su just a checklist item he had to take care of before he checked out. Dae Su's revenge attempt at revenge only leaves him completely lost, with far more guilt than he imagined possible. He is left more powerless than he was when he was imprisoned, turning to hypnosis, one of the tools used against him, as his only means of coping.
Smuttynose Brewing Company Smuttynose Imperial Stout (Big Beer Series)
Since February, we have been regularly putting stuff on sale on Facebook. To date, we have sold for 150$! We still have things for sale: our old refrigerator, an oven, videos game, books, shoes and more. The trick is to not be stressed. We can’t do a yard sale because the yard where we live is not ours. The stuff we won’t be able to sell here will be sold in a yard sale in our next apartment where we have a big parking space. Since we don’t seem desperate to sell everything right now, we are able to get good prices for things that we never use and accumulate in our closets.
I sit here and write a blog titled "May Be Miracles;" I can't not take the opportunity to highlight this amazing song from the show. Please take a moment and click on the link below to watch one song from "The Miracle" called "The Miracle I Need." (Taken out of context of course so not nearly as powerful as seeing the whole show...but still...worth a watch).
He let her murmur and mumble a while longer. She was hungry – no matter. She was thirsty – he had splattered drops of water over her face these last couple of days, making her beg for it, licking as far as her tongue could reach around her lips, her chin, below her cheeks.
of the living?
3 stopped
The legislation in force and passed before approving this Constitution remain in force until they are amended in accordance with its provisions, provided that the amendment is done within a period of no longer than 3 years.
this is why
1188 **D-VI/29/1994. “The Instructive Obviousness of the Constitution of 1787.” Nottingham-Trent Law Students Program, Loyola University of Chicago, Rome Center, Rome, Italy. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(10), above, pp. 98-114.)
I can’t wait for the produce guy to get back with his fresh load. I’m hoping he has something I’ve never had before!
When I started out outlining ‘Truly, Madly, Deeply, You’ I thought of a sentence for the male lead in the story. So I came up with Beta heroes need love too. Haha. Not original, I know, but very true.
Dentists are outside the scope of EMTALA, they must have a good lobby. I don't blame them and, in retrospect, dental school looks pretty sweet.
The last person I had in mind as an “expert learned at law” was the fairy queen of UCT Prof Pierre de Vos who in 2004 won a case against a Cape Town gay bar called “Sliver” for discriminating against his coloured lover, Marcus Pillay. The bouncers also severely assaulted both. He is obviously liberally biased.
Changes?: I used butter instead of margarine
Made of oak the central part of the tread is recessed to take the carpet and instead of a traditional banister or more predictable glass and steel, 6m lengths of engineered oak run right from the top of the house to the bottom.
Though after I’ve quit I may write a tell-all article about the experience.
Gratitude Stamp Set
Walk Two - "Winster and Birchover" - 4 miles (2 hours). On an untypically hot March afternoon, I undertook this walk with my friend Mick. We drove south to the village of Winster - west of Matlock and south of Chatsworth. My oh my - what a delightful village Winster is with a mixture of limestone and gritstone cottages - some of which date back to the sixteenth century. In its heyday, it must have been an important regional centre - when people's lives were lived in small circles and to get anywhere you travelled by horse and cart. There was also a lot of lead mining thereabouts.
To Heaven and Back Mom! Kisses and Pink Roses~
“Jacob Zuma wants an aircraft carrier, and it will be partly up to convicted fraudster Tony Yengeni to decide who will get the contract to supply a warship potentially costing even more than the four frigates bought as part of the controversial 1999 R60 billion arms deal.”
It takes both a bride and a groom to have a wedding. It might come as a news flash to some men that you don’t merely show up on the big day, grace everyone with your presence, and that is all there is to it. Like major business projects, a wedding requires detailed planning to be a success. Perfect execution requires the making of numerous contingency plans to cover all the “what if’s” and possible detours that might end up as a part of the big day.
The NPA rebels, numbering 30 to 50, opened fire at a convoy of three trucks carrying the 86th IB soldiers, including battalion commander Lt. Col. Eugene Batara. The soldiers just came from a command turnover in Tinoc town and were on their way back to headquarters in Kiangan town.
It’s never easy to put together leaders in the same group. Since everyone is a leader, everyone has his own opinion, decision, plan and action. And no one would easily give up his stand. No wonder there was a scene in the movie where they were all yelling at each other, pointing out each other’s flaws, hiding their own shortcomings and trying to push their own opinions. Such scene is never unfamiliar to us. I suppose that at one point we all have accused the people around us, looked down on them and considered ourselves better than anyone else. At one point, we all thought that we are THE superhero. And as such, we do things on our own just as the characters did in the movie. And what’s the result? It was epic! Epic fail! I guess we cannot really accomplish much or maybe none at all unless we get our acts together and see the importance of the people around us. Maybe we also need a sparkplug. For the avengers, it was probably the death of their avid fan. Maybe it reminded them of why they are called ‘superheroes’ in the first place. And maybe we also need to go back to the vision of why we are called to be leaders in the first place. (Why are we here and why are we doing this?) But was that sparkplug enough for them to succeed? Not quite. I think they all realized that someone from among them really need to take on the lead and that they need to follow no matter how uncomfortable it may be. For them, it’s in the person of Captain America. I wasn’t quite sure though why it had to be him. Was it because he was the first avenger, the ‘captain’ and he had formal training and a powerful shield? But why not Iron Man who has the most advanced suit and can fly? Or Thor who is a god of thunder and has a powerful hammer? Why not Hulk who has extraordinary smashing power and strength? Or Hawkeye who has insane precision with arrows? Or maybe Black Widow who’s quite skilled with guns and stunts? I, myself do not know the answer. But I’m sure it’s a test of character for them. It was a test for Captain America to lead the other superheroes. And it was a test for the rest of them to humbly follow the orders of the captain. And we, ourselves are probably wondering why some people are in the position while others are not. But leadership is not just a position; it is a responsibility. And that’s the beauty of a team. One leads and the others follow but they all work for one common goal. The same is true with the church, family or in any organization. We are all important and each one of us has a role to play that would contribute to the bigger picture whether or not we are at the topmost position. We need to assemble and set aside our differences and preferences. We must choose to choose our battles. After all, there’s only one villain. For them it was Loki. For us it is the devil.
Power theft has resulted in losses of more than R100m annually to the municipality annually over the past five years and everything points towards a similar loss for the 2009/2010 financial year.
Exacerbating the entire mess is that the city is so densely populated that construction must be done at inauspicious times and places while the city goes about its business. Subways are 24 hours, so service must often be rerouted and disrupted, much to the chagrin of daily commuters.
Berman: Romney’s camp says only poor
Suddenly the door opens and Shredder Smith appears.
Two Nuns are walking through Transylvania late one night, on the way home from a Transylvanian convention for Nuns. A vampire jumps out at them, from the undergrowth. "Agh!" shouts one of the Nuns, "a vampire. Quickly, show him your cross!" The other Nun shakes her fist at the vampire. "Grr," she says, "I am so angry with you right now."
New Belgium Vrienden
This is the layout that I ended up making (so we are now about an hour on from the previous photo!) of a trip to the Yorkshire Wildlife Park last summer. This layout follows this weeks sketch from Nuts about sketches and fits with the theme of 'animals' from lasting memories. I am also entering this into Pollycrafts 'check it out', The Crazy Challenge 'go green', Tuesday Throwdown 'Spring clean' (the checked K&Co paper has been in my stash for about 4 years as have the leaves), Daring Cardmakers 'lucky green', and Crazy4challenges 'green' challenges. That is all from me. Have a great week everyone.
I can't wait to see how this turns out. Catch you all tomorrow!! Have a great evening!
We did allow the kids three whole turns on the carousel at Bear Mountain. Which, I suppose when you're five, is some version of heaven.
President Mandela came on a state visit two years after winning the first democratic election in 1994, and returned again 18 months ago during his 90th birthday celebrations. Thabo Mbeki, Zuma's predecessor as president, came over with his wife on a state visit in 2001.
Stanford University is one of the top 5 universities in the United States, so that’s a solid definition. To be an atheist is to be a person who makes the claim that, as a matter of FACT, there is no intelligent agent who created the universe. Atheists think that there is no God, and theists think that there is a God. Both claims are objective claims about the way the world is out there, and so both sides must furnish forth arguments and evidence as to how they are able to know what they are each claiming.
Be wrong,
It’s a little early to try to get you excited about my book—I’d tell you the title, but it’s probably just going to change anyway—so instead I think I’ll focus my energies on establishing my own personal brand.
So you're welcome to disagree with me about which music I love, but I was just listening to OK Computer, and listened to "Exit Music For a Film" followed by "Let Down" followed by "Karma Police" -- which, despite having made so many great songs, might be the best three-song run Radiohead's ever strung together on an album. Might.
After I stopped bawling (perhaps not the best idea to visit a burial sight as a pregnant, hormonal, emotional wreck), we eventually made our way to the bath house, which was like a spa or health club. Nothing like the idea of imagining naked Roman men to improve your mood.
Should science by governed by methodological materialism? That is, should scientists assume that only undirected causes can figure in their theories and explanations? If the answer to these questions is yes, then there can be no such thing as teleological science or intelligent design. But is methodological materialism a defensible approach to science, or might it prevent scientists from discovering important truths about the natural world? In my contribution to The Waning of Materialism (Oxford University Press, 2010), edited by Robert Koons and George Bealer, I consider twelve of the most common arguments in favor of methodological materialism and show that none of them is convincing.
We are also going to be without internet for a few days,
How excited are we about Chef Zimmern's participation? Hmmm, let's see: our guest judge for Eating Your Words 2010 is also slated to be a guest judge on Bravo's Top Chef Masters, Season Two . . . We. Are. Excited.
So maybe they were a little tipsy (the bachelors)…and maybe they were newish to golf…but they were just playing a leisurely game, trying to enjoy the day and their friends’ last moments of freedom.
I'll miss you Rose. I hope you are proud of what you see tonight, as you look down over us all. Your motto was to "Leave it better than you found it", and I'll assure you, you did.
If it weren't for her tall friend blocking me constantly I would be hooking up with her as we speak, she was THAT interested.
I used old couch cushions so I had to cut them in half (I ended up using 3 halves and an extra little portion)
If your not in the bar trade, or just fancy creating some cocktails, try out some of the recipes below, or better still, ask your local bartender to create. Enjoy!
intricately woven on
for a few minutes
Fill out your profile BEFORE you make your first post. You do not have to reveal everything about yourself...keep it simple! You may want to list your interests so that other members can find and connect with you. If you have valuable experience in areas that concern the forum, you may want to list those.
Next up, Part III: "Many Beers Had I"
The family has not been able to access the autopsy report but they have been told Mbatsha died after suffering an epileptic fit.
To the percentage of today's youth who are not a part of this parasitic entitlement mentality group, my advice to you is you better damn well do anything and everything you can to set yourself apart from your leeching comrades.
Here is APSCUF’s official statement:
Not that I expected anything less from Miss Sara B. But even though I know her to be an amazing vocalist, I was still in awe of her performance.
Long pause. Spouse #2 mentally readies possible projectiles, this doesn’t sound good. Infidelity? Hidden gambling addiction? The milk is spoiled? OUT WITH IT!!!
“I discovered whatever I’m doing in yoga, I’m doing five times a day in prayer,” said Mr. Rashid, who is originally from Dhaka, Bangladesh.
During the book it was hard to read as Anita keeps her men growing. Sure it is fun to read but at times you wish she would gain control already. The extra tigers was a different take in the story but they are just another group of men in her bed. It is getting a little annoying.
Hard Afro Jazz, Funk, & Beat - Compiled by TheFifthMicrophone
Well, we have 3 sponsors this time...
JNG: It was an evolution of things, really. I worked in retail all throughout college as a sales girl, then as a stylist, and eventually as a buyer. I worked in a high-end department store and then made my way into smaller boutiques. I found that out of all the aspects of a retail environment, I most loved merchandising the floors, doing displays, and designing signage! I started my first blog while I was in college as well and designed it myself -- it was right in the beginning of the whole world of design blogs, and even though I had no idea what I was doing, I began doing posts about all kinds of things I was into at the time -- people found me (somehow!) and started asking me to do little design projects here and there. Long story short, it got so demanding that I quit my job and began freelancing full-time. So from my blog evolved my company! I reformed and re-shaped that first blog into The Love List, and it runs as a great compliment to my company, Front Porch Studio, to this day.
Even if I had assessed the signs to reflect what turned out to be reality, I was still allowing my passions to add two plus two to get 10. There was no way to know what I later found out to be true and, truth be told, it would not have lessened the pain anyway. What it did do, however, is jeopardize any future relationship I would have. It is yet another “sign” that reason can easily explain away, but passion will pick up and run with. My friend’s statement about impending doom loses all irony, becoming instead a self-fulfilling prophecy. Self-fulfilling prophecies, by definition, fulfill themselves. And that insanity, after a long absence, has revisited me recently. Reason was telling me that there is no there there, but my passions were running the show. As reason was trying to warn me, passion was busy engaging the self-destruct mechanism. Fortunately my fiance is incredibly forgiving (one of many things I love about her) and did not kick me to the curb.
Then I realized what my problem was! I was picturing it in the wrong room. The second I moved it from the living room to my studio (in my head) I knew exactly how it would look. And I couldn't be happier with the end result.
And it stuck. I took cabaret for the last 4 years.
you'll have more success if you wait for the first
On internet “Social Networking” sites for young people to meet others our young women present themselves as tarts and most say they “like getting drunk.” Their clothes and poses show them as anybody’s meat. They are imitating people on TV. talent shows and think they will be spotted, and slappers who have made fortunes showing their silicon boobs.
Will always have ripe blackberries to eat and a sunny spot
Oh everybody knows, everybody knows
They just want you to care.
My studio is up and running, which will make a massive difference. This will be the first summer during which I can work from home, torches and all, and that means I can take on custom orders and work on some of my own production stuff. Happily I have several custom orders queued up, not to mention the designs of mine that were accepted to the American Crafts Council show in early August and still need to be made.
How are you? progressive? yep. unpretentious? yep. Rainy in August? YEP. Which is actually fine, I don't like hot weather clothes - I love my little short dresses, but only with tights as I am happily very fair, but unhappily constantly bruised because i'm clumsy and have very questionable spatial awareness with my body. Wearing tights in 90 degrees seems weird, but not here, when its 65.
4. Leave the Driving – 7:14
I’m the first to admit that I’m not the most patient person. Sometimes, that alone is a serious understatement. I caught myself earlier this week, when two of us were really frustrated with a math lesson, tempted to just pick up the book and throw it across the room. Then it dawned on me. I wonder how I’d react if one of the kids did that to a cake I made them. Yeah, I’m not kidding anyone. I’m not the teacher around here.
Most of my memories of their union are joyful, happy & loving.
So, what advice can you offer? How did you get your business off the ground?
“Of course! It was an action film for crying out loud! There were things exploding in almost every scene!”
While I may have gone for the odd Harveistoun Ola Dubh, and Sam Smiths Imperial Stout, I didn't really take much British beer. There was a reason behind this. I can still get British beers pretty easily, because I live here. I went for about 90% European and International beer because I knew I might never see them again, and I didn't want to forget some timeless classics that beer has to offer.
So, I went on to say-- "You are keeping A from reaching his bottom." You are hoping for a drug addict, in denial, to miraculously come up with rent money. It's not gonna happen. He'll buy drugs before he'll pay you."
Rich and sweet aroma, brown sugar, and that's how its tastes also. The malts give caramel and toffee, with a sort of luxurious smooth quality and depth, reminding you of the best Belgian beers.
The social norm is to say Happy New Year. But what exactly am I wishing for 2011 when I say that? What will make one happy? Who is the happiest person you know? That’s right. Homer Simpson.
With the help of Real Time information from Dublin Bus, I can keep working right down to the wire. I am well practiced in running for the bus at the last minute and I’ve only been caught out once or twice.
* In the Shadow of the Fryolator is about a cook at a diner who is approached by a Cthulhuoid creature who wants to marry her. Seems she's descended from some other Lovecraftian beastie and is destined to marry this monster and reign with him over subjugated mankind, bwa-ha-ha-ha. This is the strongest entry in the book, though not great by any means. It does highlight something that bugged me about many of the news items -- this book is clearly set in a mythos universe. There are references to Miskatonic U. and various eldritch abominations -- but all those abominations are given fake Lovecraftian names, including the Cthulhuoid creature, H'telred (get it?) from Y'harneth, a great city in the "briny depths of the Esoteric Trench. If you're going to do the Mythos, do the Mythos. Call the guy Cthulhu of R'lyeh.
marks the many beginning of life
(These are just the sample glasses, hers don't have any of the stickers on the lenses)......
Colgate Save $.50/1 kids toothpaste (4/14)
500 grams of Minced Beef/Lamb/Pork
from using footnotes and any special formatting,
Tootles, Sue
The world is not coming to an end as a result of all of this. We are all still here. That's a good thing. This is an opportunity to learn from this experience. Rather than worry about the U.S.'s new, lower credit rating and what that means, casting blame at how we got there, repeating stories of whose fault it is and creating a fear and panic about where we're going, this is an opportunity for us to unite toward solutions that feel better. We can do that by finding things to appreciate in this situation right now.
I find this very odd, anyone with half a brain should see the logical steps here - that's why the monarchists should be opposing it, if their rationale is to keep one big anachronism they shouldn't let the peripheral anachronisms be altered, likewise any reformer should be pushing for real equality - otherwise they're just shallow and trendy twits
Sugar sweetens our food. But it also sweetens life. I always eat chocolate to cheer me up if the day hasn’t gone well and as a reward if it has. So did Elizabeth – although her sugar was made into pretty rose petals.
In 1952 a second federal attempt against media violence was launched, this time in the House of
John Hopewell – Co-Chair; BC Region
One of the other new things I discovered while in Indianapolis for this family event, was the kolache. In short- dough stuffed with goodness. In Indy there is even a place that served up a variety of these delectable carb-coma- inducing meals- The Kolache Factory. We would order them for breakfast one morning and bring them back to the house to serve the masses. Kolaches can have just about any filling you could desire: fruit, cream cheese, eggs and sausage, ham and Swiss, pepperoni and mozzerella, potato...I even recently read about someone taking their Thanksgiving leftovers and stuffing it into a kolache. Pretty much anything goes!
The Celebration (Thomas Vinterberg, director)
It is tempting to say that my intent to develop my artistic skills will result in me finding that my skills actually do wax towards the analytic, but there’s no real way for me to know that. I’ve never had formal instruction, so I may find that I have more of a balance than I originally thought.
If you are concerned about fragile items, you can place a Special request, so that Shipito can add extra packaging material. Or just keep fragile items in original boxes (for extra layer of protection).
Bear was feeling peckish by then and decided it was time for lunch, so we drove back up to Kings Lynn where we had it on very good authority there was a Nandos. We had a calm little talk about how you can’t always drive right up to the restaurant so we simply found a car park in the vicinity and decided to hoof it from there. I didn’t have enough change for the parking machine though and I was trying to all to pay on my phone through the phone mechanism when a car pulled up, the window rolled down and the driver stuck his arm out. He was holding his parking ticket and called to Bear. “Hey mate, I’m leaving now.” It was already paid up for the whole day. We thanked him profusely and he just said, “It’s your turn tomorrow!” and drove off. I really hadn’t been looking forward to navigating the phone pay menu in the blowing wind (it was getting fairly chilly and had been overcast all day).
Starring: Kirsten Dunst, Charlotte Gainsborough, Kiefer Sutherland
Van Sant always tries to use local crew if possible. Portland’s TV and film work has been exploding recently…with ‘Grimm’, ’Portlandia’ and ‘Leverage’ shooting here. The crew was very nice…very supportive and even listened to me when I suggested a certain camera angle.
This “hang” also took longer than usual, but as with the Stone Church show, I am very pleased with the results. An additional benefit that I get from this kind of a show is that Peggy is very happy to promote the “Dinner with the Artist” series at Nikki’s Dream, which I will present at in June.
And the skins of the Lamanites were dark, according to the mark which was set upon their fathers, which was a curse upon them because of their transgression and their rebellion against their brethren, who consisted of Nephi, Jacob, and Joseph, and Sam, who were just and holy men.
And for many years you could have had the world there at your feet
some Spellbinder die sets that I have had for over a year and had
Water two feet for shrubs
The light has seared the surface
Breakfast for dinner.
If Simon le Bon was reading a book on Shakespeare, so was I. If he liked Andy Warhol, so did I. If Peter Murphy was reading Herman Hesse, me too. I stand by my crushes, though. They made me curious about writing and music and art.
- Did you take one of the parrot's pills?
Monday morning came and I got myself out of the house with plenty of time.
As for me, I was glad he loved it, though he didn’t say it in words…his eyes said it all.
The Pop-Up Exhibition went really really well.
It looked pretty different from the non-washed areas but you noticed the biggest difference after it dried.
Dr. Alan said that Tylenol, Ibuprofen and vitamins are not readily available and they want them and need them at the clinic. He said that after the medical site is closed, the medications that were not used are left for the clinic.
Back to the Senate
The proverbial boxes come in many different shapes, sizes, and looks. Here’s just a few of the ones I’ve seen people stuck in. I’m sure there are others but we’ll concentrate on just these few. Do any of them fit you and your business?
Once I did that, the rest was kind of...easy, actually. The trick was to stop lying to myself. Having the Disability Card in your Life Deck makes that easy sometimes, and I don't mean to offend anybody who struggles with their life, especially when the crushing weight of all that assaults you and being the parent of a child with a disability gets to be too much. If anybody in this digital domain is guilty of letting this life get them down, it is me. I have struggled, and I will continue to struggle.
The older I got, the less hope I had of ever finding ANY blood relatives. I have sufficiently put myself out there and there was no way that if someone was looking for me that they couldn’t find me.
When the next level of resolution and subsurface penetration is required, NEOS secures widely available helicopter platforms capable of deploying our advanced sensor payload system. Towed beneath the helicopter at an elevation of 30 meters above the ground, our typical rotary-wing payload package includes electromagnetic, radiometric, high resolution magnetic, hyperspectral, and gas detection sensors that NEOS has refined and optimized for natural resource mapping.
Today's post is my final post for the series New Beginnings, I started for the month of April. The first Monday in May will start my May series, which will be dedicated to mothers in honor of Mother's Day.
Monkey – Just one of my favorite words. Penny (my kitty) is also a monkey.
Yep that is right I have some candy to give away....I am talking crafting Candy too you know...
It was truly an evening for self-discovery; for example, I discovered that I SUCK at Guitar Hero, that I am not the indisputable karaoke queen that I thought I was, AND that I can, by myself, put a huge dent in a box of Target cabernet. (OK, truth be known, I had kinda already figured out that last one already.)
This will certainly be a day that I and most of the people of Leicester will certainly not forget quickly. This of course is all down to the Queen, The Duke of Edinburgh and Catherine the Duchess of Cambridge paying a royal visit to the city, as the first part of the Diamond Jubilee Tour. Making my way into the city, I can honestly sat that there were enough metal barriers to fortify a castle, and police officers, my gosh there were enough to fill two football stadiums. I don’t think a ghost would have escaped there attention or even gotten through the barriers.
Shame the Devil, published by Little, Brown in the States in 2000. This one is the fourth entry in what's known as the D.C. Quartet – but it's also an entry in the Nick Stefanos series – see also A Firing Offense (1992), Nick's Trip (1993) and Down by the River Where the Dead Men Go (1995) (and, in briefer appearances, Soul Circus and What It Was) – as Nick features in this one, too. George Pelecanos's website has a synopsis (no extract in this instance, though), but allow me to direct you towards my esteemed friend Olman for a fuller review, including links to reviews of the three prior D.C. Quartet novels. Unlike Orion, Little, Brown are perfectly happy to credit cover designers, and the jacket on this US edition was designed by Tom Brown, utilising a photograph by Joshua Sheldon. And also unlike Orion – and most other British publishers for that matter – Little, Brown have chosen to finish the book with lovely deckled edges – on which nerdily bibliophiliac note it's probably best to draw a line under the Pelecanos posts.
Nicodemus, who died while weeping at this grave, was also buried there along with Gamaliel’s godson Abibus and Gamaliel himself upon his repose.
physical?
I've also placed this in the sidebar for you to grab and place on your blogs to help us spread the word, and get even more people prepared for Christmas this year!
Expect the game to be multiplat! Wait did I just suggest two games are actually in the works? Yes I suspect this new AAA MMORPG will launch on WiiU/PC/Mac much like Ghost Recon Online.
We both agreed that the food was fresh, and the restaurant is located in the perfect spot for lunch in the park, but The Grove did not sweep us off our feet. How did you spend your St. Patty’s Day?
So - fast forward to my life between January - March of this year. Eric and I went through some tough times... my grandma passed away in January and at the end of February Eric had blod clots in his lungs and had to be hospitalized. The first three months of 2011 were probably the hardest times that I have had to go through. The talk of having a family continued, especially now since we had gone through such a scary experience with him! I told him about someone who I went to college with is adopting two children from Ethiopia! We talked and talked about it which brought up the idea of adoption again. I remember him saying "I want a little baby from Ethiopia." Of course, I replied with something like, "Would you really want to adopt??" As our conversation went on I noticed Eric was all for the idea of wanting to adopt and having our own children FIRST didn't seem to be a priority to him anymore. I couldn't believe it! I was so thrilled! And if anyone knows my husband you know he is a bit impulsive, whereas I am more analytical and need to think out every decision (especially those big life decisions!). Well, when Eric said let's do this, there was no analyzing that situation!!! It was amazing how happy I felt and excited that I was going to be a mom! It wasn't until then that I realized I DO want to have a family I DO want to be a mom. All those feelings I had before weren't about not wanting a family, it's just more the nervouness about being pregnant (which I still cannot really explain my feelings about this! That's just the way I feel!). Having a family isn't just about physically having a child, it's about loving and taking care of him no matter how he comes into the world. :)
Anyone
He looked back at the body. “Guess I settled two debts then.”
Firstly, during February half-term, we decided a little break was in order. We decided to miss the place we normally go, a beautiful apartment in a converted farmhouse in Swaledale, and head over to the Lake District for a couple of nights. Some nice food, some good walks and some great scenery were just the tonic we needed after our both having hectic times at work. But, what we needed most was a bit of rest in the middle of nowhere and to get away from it all. Unfortunately, we chose to stay at Hawkrigg Guest House in Bowness. If you want to know the full story, you can click on the previous link.
It's been a long morning already. Matthew fought me on going to preschool this morning. Normally, if he can justify to me his reasonings, I listen. However this morning after several failed attempts to convince me why he shouldn't go to school he says:
Return To Django
The van was later recovered with half of the money still left inside.
Also the next 7 people who message me via FB with their address from the UK (either Like my fanpage or follow me on twitter) will get a set of bookmarks x
“Yes. I wish I could get the same sticky stuff that the rats had. That would do it, wouldn’t it? And it would stick.”
Then it marinated for a while until I got into Ravelry and put it in my Ravelry stash, strangely using a different Flickr account than my normal one, on June 28, 2007. Apparently I created a second Flickr account in June of 2007, uploaded stash pics over a couple weeks, and completely forgot about it.*
Future World-Keeper of the seven keys Pt.I
How will this little squeezable bottle of mustard help you get through a breakup, you might ask? Let me explain:
But that’s a lie.
For bugs, all of these converging details made the city into a paradise.
The Bible, tells us that there is no other way to cleanse sin, but through the sacrifice of an innocent one (Hebrews 9:22). This is seen all the way back in the beginning when Adam and Eve sinned in the Garden of Eden, (Genesis 3:21). This same line of thought continues all the way through the days of the Tabernacle and the Temple. There, sin was atoned for by the blood of sheep, bulls and goats, but it was never taken away, (Hebrews 10:4; Hebrews 10:10-11). However, the Lord Jesus went to the cross and died for the sins of humanity. When He did, His death on the cross forever settled the sin debt of man, (Hebrews 10:12-14; Hebrews 9:24-28). Is it clear yet? If not, read Revelations 1:5; 1 Peter 1:18-19.
A couple hours after that party ended, the family party began. Grandparents (including Great Grandma) and Aaron/Katie's family attended. The kids made bookmarks, destroyed a pineta and played the balloon/charades game. We, of course, ate the goodies and watched Kaitlyn be spoiled (opening gifts). I know LOTS of pictures were taken...just not with my camera....I SOO need to do better at that!!!! So family, could you please pass some along so I can post more??? Thanks!!!
May this episode serve as a grave warning to other states that the Federal government could just as easily and willingly violate and impeded their rights as these two states. As this story develops, I hope and pray South Carolina and Texas will rise to the occasion to nullify any Federal interference and stand with the same tenacity as their forefathers did.
The research also showed that:
Each club is guaranteed a minimum of 10 facility fee payments, while
Email me at cassie8978@gmail.com to RSVP and obtain the address. Also, let me know what you would like to bring. If too many people are bringing similar dishes, you may be assigned a different type of dish or drink. Also email what you're wearing so we don't show up wearing the same thing. ;) kidding!
new levels of my circle of hell
I’m starting to believe it is my duty solely at this point to try and coutner this trend in the field because it seems that the apathy and complacency has completely worked.
I do believe that there are real Buddhas on the planet, true realized masters who have fully integrated their own shadow and live in the oneness of absolute, eternal love. But the light of pure consciousness is not a conditional light like that of day and night. The light we cultivate to embody in the practice of yoga is not about luminosity to outshine the dark, but about the ultimate dissolve of the ego's need for duality into the eternal substratum that is the essential underpinning of all of creation. We are limited humans with limited words, so we call that substratum "light". How can a finite word in a dual world ever capture the perfection of such a force? That is where mystical poets like Rumi take the floor.
and long before mankind - caught on.
Friends are family we choose
I haven't attended Maundy Thursday or Good Friday services in several years. I don't have anything against them.
I will have bought a lot of equipment that will last me for years to come. The stapler and the rotary board will last me forever if I am carefull. add $6 for blades every now and then. The printer will be good for at least 10000 copies, probably more. and I will still have $33 bucks in my pockets.
Posted on Mar 19, 2005, Source: TomPaine.com
Each year at the end of April beautiful plump fresh artichokes hit the markets and my heart skips a beat as I eagerly load my basket with globes of this vibrant green thistle vegetable. My favorite artichoke recipe is one that I make only once or twice a year, first, because the season is so short here in the northeast and two, because it can be a bit time consuming. So for the third time that had I arrived home with close to a dozen artichokes this year I sought a simpler recipe.
And the love that exists, no one e’er can efface.
But I can feel your
Blackened? Not really. It's closer to a brown. It's like their hillbilly dislike for black people kept them from making a black beer, too. It has that wet raisin smell that poorly made lagers often have.
“Everything sad,” he says. “Everything.”
We each have created a special card or project using at least one of our own personal ALL TIME FAVORITE ODBD sets. SIX of us will also have a special blog button with a special flower on it! (It will be labeled as a Designer's Flower Hunt Game, and will give the name of a flower.) Look for it in the designer's side bars of their blogs. HINT: I just might be one of the designers who has one... so look carefully! :)
From the album: "Music Hall is irreverent but basically good-natured, brassy, raucous, obvious, sentimental and fun." Merv Griffin only sings on five tracks, which is fine, as Treacher's performance seems more in the spirit of the Music Hall. Maybe it's the English accent?
Now to cook the bread. Try not to knock the bread as you put it into the oven and don’t slam the door when you close the oven, or you might undo all that hard work of making a light bread. For a loaf, bake for around twenty to twenty five minutes and for mini loaves or rolls for around ten to fifteen minutes. You can tell if the bread is cooked by tapping it’s bottom (you’ll have to remove it from the tin in order to do this). If it sounds hollow, then it’s cooked, if not then cook for a little longer.
Somehow this is very thrilling for me!
Whilst I also loved a number of thrillers including, The Secret in their Eyes which is wonderfully intricate, sinister and above all, engrossing; Winter’s Bone, icy, visceral and unforgiving mountain noir; whilst Revanche was restrained and subtle yet menacingly tense.
I'm a writer. And after years of wordsmithing I think I've reached the point where I can call myself that without it sounding odd (to me) or egotistical (to everyone else). It's what I am, not what I do. I know that because I'm most happy when I'm writing... about anything. Well, almost anything. I probably wouldn't be too passionate about the lifestyles of the broke and infamous, but... ya never know. In the past I've written about George Lucas' Star Wars and PC video games, and I'm sure I'll eventually stumble onto some other topic that will "light my fire." At the end of the day it always boils down to one thing for me: passion.
